Skin exudate levels of interleukin 6, interleukin 1 and other cytokines in mycosis fungoides.
Selective regulation of the activity of different hematopoietic regulatory proteins by transforming growth factor beta 1 in normal and leukemic myeloid cells.
Lymphokine-activated killer (LAK) cell activity in B and T chronic lymphoid leukemia: defective LAK generation and reduced susceptibility of the leukemic cells to allogeneic and autologous LAK effectors.
A new monoclonal antibody (CH-F42) recognizes a CD7- subset of normal T lymphocytes and circulating malignant cells in adult T-cell lymphoma-leukemia and Sezary syndrome.
Expression of transcobalamin II receptors by human leukemia K562 and HL-60 cells.
A retrospective analysis of therapy for acute graft-versus-host disease: initial treatment.
Coordinate secretion of interleukin-1 beta and granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor by the blast cells of acute myeloblastic leukemia: role of interleukin-1 as an endogenous inducer.
Trisomy 13: a new recurring chromosome abnormality in acute leukemia.
B-cell differentiation following autologous, conventional, or T-cell depleted bone marrow transplantation: a recapitulation of normal B-cell ontogeny.
Transmission of HTLV-I by blood transfusion and its prevention by passive immunization in rabbits.
Adrenaline and nocturnal asthma.
Prevalence of HIV antibody and pregnancy in Tayside, 1984-9: background to screening.
Failure of nutritional recovery after total gastrectomy.
Physicians' perception of personal risk of HIV infection and AIDS through occupational exposure.
Gastrointestinal function and structure in HIV-positive patients.
Rearrangement of immunoglobulin, T-cell receptor, and bcl-2 genes in malignant lymphomas in Hong Kong.
Human T-cell leukemia virus type 1 associated with small cell lung cancer.
Angiotropic (intravascular) large cell lymphoma. A clinicopathologic study of seven cases with unique clinical presentations.
Primary leptomeningeal B-cell lymphoma in a 8-year-old child.
Genetic aspects of juvenile chronic arthritis.
Immunologic abnormalities of juvenile arthritis.
Soluble mediators of articular cartilage degradation in juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
Growth abnormalities in children with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
Medical treatment of juvenile arthritis.
The surgery of juvenile chronic arthritis. An overview.
A three-year retrospective study of synovectomies in children.
Total hip and knee arthroplasty in juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
Mucoid impaction of upper lobe bronchi in the absence of proximal bronchiectasis.
Pulmonary alveolar proteinosis associated with Pneumocystis carinii. Ultrastructural identification in bronchoalveolar lavage in AIDS and immunocompromised non-AIDS patients.
Characteristics and correlates of asthma in a university clinic population.
Formoterol in the treatment of nocturnal asthma.
Quality of life in elderly patients with chronic nonspecific lung disease seen in family practice.
Reactive airway dysfunction syndrome in three police officers following a roadside chemical spill.
Effect of PAF-acether inhalation on nonspecific bronchial reactivity and adrenergic response in normal and asthmatic subjects.
Studies on autoimmunity for initiation of beta-cell destruction. VI. Macrophages essential for development of beta-cell-specific cytotoxic effectors and insulitis in NOD mice.
Genetic control by I-A subregion in H-2 complex of incidence of streptozocin-induced autoimmune diabetes in mice.
Hepatocyte plasma membrane glycosphingolipid reactive with sera from patients with autoimmune chronic active hepatitis: its identification as sulfatide.
Amyloid deposition in intrahepatic large bile ducts and peribiliary glands in systemic amyloidosis.
Amyloidosis in saphenous vein aortocoronary bypass grafts.
Modulation of interleukin-1 beta RNA in monocytic cells infected with human immunodeficiency virus-1.
Autoantibodies to the HLA-B27 sequence cross-react with the hypothetical peptide from the arthritis-associated Shigella plasmid.
Polyclonal B cell activation in lupus-prone mice precedes and predicts the development of autoimmune disease.
Failure of T cell receptor-anti-CD3 monoclonal antibody interaction in T cells from marrow recipients to induce increases in intracellular ionized calcium.
Tartrate resistant acid phosphatase positive splenic lymphoma: a relatively benign condition occurring in a time-space cluster?
Effect of sample volume on yield of positive blood cultures from adult patients with haematological malignancy.
Hypereosinophilic syndrome with unusual cutaneous manifestations in two men with HIV infection.
Photochemotherapy improves chronic cutaneous graft-versus-host disease.
Incidence of cutaneous T cell lymphoma and other rare skin cancers in a defined population.
Platelet activating factor-induced clinical and histopathologic responses in atopic skin and their modification by the platelet activating factor antagonist BN52063.
Cutaneous lesions of disseminated histoplasmosis in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients.
Itraconazole in opportunistic mycoses: cryptococcosis and aspergillosis.
Enhanced reactive oxygen species metabolism of airspace cells and airway inflammation follow antigen challenge in human asthma.
Anaphylaxis during induction of general anesthesia: subsequent evaluation and management.
Repeated exposure of asthmatic airways to inhaled adenosine 5'-monophosphate attenuates bronchoconstriction provoked by exercise.
Determinants of in vivo histamine release in cutaneous allergic reactions in humans.
The relationships among shrimp-specific IgG subclass antibodies and immediate adverse reactions to shrimp challenge.
Augmentation of monocyte chemotaxis by 1 alpha,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3. Stimulation of defective migration of AIDS patients.
In vivo effects of anti-IL-4 monoclonal antibody on neonatal induction of tolerance and on an associated autoimmune syndrome.
Loss of epidermal integrity by T cell-mediated attack induces long term local resistance to subsequent attack. II. Thymus dependency in the induction of the resistance.
Intact antigen receptor-mediated generation of inositol phosphates and increased intracellular calcium in CD4 CD8 T lymphocytes from MRL lpr mice.
Human severe combined immunodeficiency disease: phenotypic and functional characteristics of peripheral B lymphocytes.
Resistance to infection by HIV-1 of peripheral blood mononuclear cells from HIV-1-infected patients is probably mediated by neutralizing antibodies.
Inhibition by dexamethasone of histamine production in allergic inflammation in rats.
Vesicular changes in the myopathies of AIDS. Ultrastructural observations and their relationship to zidovudine treatment.
Hemiparetic multiple sclerosis.
Hepatic venoocclusive disease in autologous bone marrow transplantation of solid tumors and lymphomas.
A surgeon's risk of AIDS.
Use of CT and MR imaging to distinguish intracranial lesions and to define the need for biopsy in AIDS patients
Impairment of neutrophil chemotactic and bactericidal function in children infected with human immunodeficiency virus type 1 and partial reversal after in vitro exposure to granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor.
Growth and neuroendocrine dysfunction in children with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome
Patterns of food hypersensitivity during sixteen years of double-blind, placebo-controlled food challenges.
Ibuprofen suspension in the treatment of juvenile rheumatoid arthritis. Pediatric Rheumatology Collaborative Study Group.
Safety and efficacy of methotrexate therapy for juvenile rheumatoid arthritis
Naproxen-induced pseudoporphyria: a distinctive photodermatitis.
Immunologic and pathologic manifestations of the infection of rhesus monkeys with simian immunodeficiency virus of macaques.
On the use of laboratory markers as surrogates for clinical endpoints in the evaluation of treatment for HIV infection.
Relationship between AIDS latency period and AIDS survival time in homosexual and bisexual men.
Monte Carlo simulation of HIV infection in an intravenous drug user community.
The risk of development of HTLV-I-associated myelopathy/tropical spastic paraparesis among persons infected with HTLV-I.
A study of HTLV-I and its associated risk factors in Trinidad and Tobago.
Prevalence of HIV infection among patients with leprosy in African countries and Yemen.
Beneficial effects of long-term treatment with SK&F 105685 in murine lupus nephritis.
Immunoadsorbent plasma perfusion in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus
CD5 positive B lymphocytes in seronegative juvenile arthritis.
Prevalence and concentration of IgM rheumatoid factor in polyarticular onset disease as compared to systemic or pauciarticular onset disease in active juvenile rheumatoid arthritis as measured by ELISA.
Morbidity associated with childhood systemic lupus erythematosus.
Systemic lupus erythematosus presenting as thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura.
Connective tissue disease in southeast Georgia. A community based study of immunogenetic markers and autoantibodies.
The heterogeneity of anticentromere antibodies in immunoblotting analysis.
Decreased number of peripheral blood CD4 + CD29+ lymphocytes and increased in vitro spontaneous production of anti-DNA antibodies in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus.
Lack of gene deletion for complement C4A deficiency in Japanese patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Adult Still's disease: a multicenter survey of Japanese patients.
Growth and differentiation of B lymphocytes of patients with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
Clonal analysis of joint fluid T lymphocytes in patients with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
HIV associated systemic necrotizing vasculitis.
Acute central nervous system symptoms caused by ibuprofen in connective tissue disease.
Rapidly progressive calcific periarthritis occurring in a patient with lupus nephritis receiving chronic ambulatory peritoneal dialysis.
Transmission of HIV-1 infections from mothers to infants in Haiti. Impact on childhood mortality and malnutrition. The CDS/JHU AIDS Project Team.
European experience of bone-marrow transplantation for severe combined immunodeficiency.
Measurement of airborne mite antigen in homes of asthmatic children
Preliminary report: complement activation in wasp-sting anaphylaxis.
Surgery for sinusitis and aspirin triad.
AIDS and pediatric neurology.
A randomized controlled trial of a reduced daily dose of zidovudine in patients with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The AIDS Clinical Trials Group.
Eosinophilic inflammation in asthma
The scid mutation in mice causes a general defect in DNA repair.
Multiple sclerosis sibling pairs: clustered onset and familial predisposition.
Diffuse CNS involvement in systemic lupus erythematosus: intrathecal synthesis of the 4th component of complement.
Ascites not due to congestive heart failure in a fetus with lupus-induced heart block.
Progressive osseous destruction as a complication of HIV-periodontitis.
Periapical lesions of mandibular bone: difficulties in early diagnostics.
IgG subclass concentrations in absolute, partial and transient IgA deficiency in childhood.
Nebulized albuterol in acute childhood asthma: comparison of two doses.
Reactions to iodinated radiographic contrast agents. How to identify and manage patients at risk.
Productive human immunodeficiency virus infection levels correlate with AIDS-related manifestations in the patient.
Polymerase chain reaction evidence for human immunodeficiency virus 1 neutralization by passive immunization in patients with AIDS and AIDS-related complex.
Adoptive transfer of autoimmune diabetes and thyroiditis to athymic rats.
Concurrent and construct validity of the Pediatric Evaluation of Disability Inventory.
Oral findings in HIV-infected patients attending a department of internal medicine: the contribution of intraoral examination towards the clinical management of HIV disease
Pulmonary neoplastic and lymphoproliferative disease in AIDS: a review.
Molecular targets for AIDS therapy.
Assessing the risk of occupational acquisition of the human immunodeficiency virus: implications for hospital policy.
Disseminated strongyloidiasis in AIDS and non-AIDS immunocompromised hosts: diagnosis by sputum and bronchoalveolar lavage.
Cytomegalovirus-induced osteomyelitis in a patient with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Use of a management plan for treating asthma in an emergency department.
HIV disease: a review for the family physician. Part I. Evaluation and conventional therapy.
Merkel cell carcinoma metastatic to the testis.
Global and molecular hemostatic markers in acute myeloid leukemia.
Isolation of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) at autopsy one to six days postmortem.
Anaplastic large cell (Ki-1) lymphoma with histiocytic phenotype simulating carcinoma.
Protein-losing enteropathy in systemic lupus erythematosus associated with intestinal lymphangiectasia.
Renal disease in the elderly: the role of the renal biopsy.
Treatment of glomerulonephritis in the elderly.
Immunoproliferative small intestinal disease: portrait of a potentially preventable cancer from the Third World.
Sexually transmitted diseases and human immunodeficiency virus infection among women with pelvic inflammatory disease.
Rapidly progressive outer retinal necrosis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome
Lyme borreliosis in the severe combined immunodeficiency (scid) mouse manifests predominantly in the joints, heart, and liver.
Morphometric analysis of follicular center cell lymphomas.
Bacterial lipopolysaccharide transforms mesangial into proliferative lupus nephritis without interfering with processing of pathogenic immune complexes in NZB/W mice.
Antidepressant pharmacotherapy of depression associated with multiple sclerosis.
Thyroid function and ultrasonically determined thyroid size in patients receiving long-term lithium treatment.
Relationship between anesthetic procedure and contact of anesthesia personnel with patient body fluids.
Bakers' asthma: prevalence and evaluation of immunotherapy with a wheat flour extract.
Oral gold therapy in steroid-dependent asthma, nasal polyposis, and aspirin hypersensitivity.
Dust mite assays in clinical allergy practice: mite antigen exposures among skin test positive patients in Kansas.
Effect of exercise on complement activity.
Bronchoconstriction induced by spirometric maneuvers in patients with bronchial asthma.
Endogenous opioids modulate the increase in ventilatory output and dyspnea during severe acute bronchoconstriction.
Effects of deep inhalation during early and late asthmatic reactions to allergen [published erratum appears in Am Rev Respir Dis 1991 Feb;143(2):451]
The effect of repetitive exercise on airway temperatures
Effect of long-term treatment with an inhaled corticosteroid (budesonide) on airway hyperresponsiveness and clinical asthma in nonsteroid-dependent asthmatics.
Epidemiology of infection by nontuberculous mycobacteria IX. Evidence for two DNA homology groups among small plasmids in Mycobacterium avium, Mycobacterium intracellulare, and Mycobacterium scrofulaceum.
Quantitation of mast cells and eosinophils in the bronchial mucosa of symptomatic atopic asthmatics and healthy control subjects using immunohistochemistry
Central airway obstruction due to cytomegalovirus-induced necrotizing tracheitis in a patient with AIDS.
Sarcoidosis complicated by HIV infection: three case reports and a review of the literature.
A clinical triad to diagnose paraneoplastic retinopathy.
Soluble interleukin-2 receptors in cerebrospinal fluid from individuals with various neurological disorders.
Multiple sclerosis is prevalent in the Zoroastrians (Parsis) of India.
In vitro cultivation of Cryptosporidium parvum and screening for anticryptosporidial drugs.
Activities of clarithromycin, sulfisoxazole, and rifabutin against Mycobacterium avium complex multiplication within human macrophages.
Transfusion-associated graft-vs-host disease in patients with malignancies. Report of two cases and review of the literature
Latent sensitisation to respiratory syncytial virus during acute bronchiolitis and lung function after recovery.
Spontaneous pneumothorax in patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome treated with prophylactic aerosolized pentamidine.
Desensitization in the management of vancomycin hypersensitivity.
A prospective necropsy study of arthritis in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Functional assessment scales: a study of persons with multiple sclerosis.
No evidence for human T-cell leukemia virus type I or human T-cell leukemia virus type II infection in patients with multiple sclerosis.
Failure to detect human T-cell leukemia virus-related sequences in multiple sclerosis blood.
Echographic features of the Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada syndrome.
Major histocompatibility complex genes and susceptibility to systemic lupus erythematosus.
Binding of anti-DNA antibodies and inhibition of glomerulonephritis in MRL-lpr/lpr mice by heparin.
Pseudotumor of the craniocervical junction during long-term hemodialysis.
Human immunodeficiency virus-associated psoriasis, psoriatic arthritis, and Reiter's syndrome: a disease continuum?
D-penicillamine-induced lupus erythematosus.
Amyloidosis in Behcet's syndrome.
A controlled trial of nebulized isoetharine in the prehospital treatment of acute asthma.
Cytotoxic activity against HIV-infected monocytes by recombinant interleukin 2-activated natural killer cells.
Macrophage tropism of HIV-1.
Characterization of a macrophage-tropic HIV strain that does not alter macrophage cytokine production yet protects macrophages from superinfection by vesicular stomatitis virus.
Full-length recombinant CD4 and recombinant gp120 inhibit fusion between HIV infected macrophages and uninfected CD4-expressing T-lymphoblastoid cells.
Effects of GLQ223 on HIV replication in human monocyte/macrophages chronically infected in vitro with HIV.
Ability of anti-HIV agents to inhibit HIV replication in monocyte/macrophages or U937 monocytoid cells under conditions of enhancement by GM-CSF or anti-HIV antibody.
Role of the monocyte-macrophage in influenza virus infection of lymphocytes: implications for HIV infection.
Macrophages as susceptible targets for HIV infection, persistent viral reservoirs in tissue, and key immunoregulatory cells that control levels of virus replication and extent of disease.
The effect of interleukin 4 (BSF-1) on infection of peripheral blood monocyte-derived macrophages with HIV-1.
Characterization of the in vitro maturation of monocytes and the susceptibility to HIV infection.
HIV-1 infection of lung alveolar fibroblasts and macrophages in humans.
FcR-mediated enhancement of HIV-1 infection by antibody.
Rash after treatment with anistreplase.
Shared idiotype expression by chronic lymphocytic leukemia and B-cell lymphoma.
Allogeneic marrow transplantation in patients with acute myeloid leukemia in first remission: a randomized trial of two irradiation regimens
Zidovudine (Retrovir) update.
An anonymous seroprevalence survey of HIV infection among pregnant women in British Columbia and the Yukon Territory
HIV infection among Quebec women giving birth to live infants
A phase I study of a new cisplatin derivative for hematologic malignancies.
The World Health Organization's histologic classification of gastrointestinal tumors. A commentary on the second edition.
Nasal lymphoma. A retrospective analysis of 60 cases.
Treatment of the acquired immune deficiency syndrome-related Kaposi's sarcoma with bleomycin as a single agent.
A randomized comparison of methotrexate dose and the addition of bleomycin to CHOP therapy for diffuse large cell lymphoma and other non-Hodgkin's lymphomas. Cancer and Leukemia Group B study 7851.
Perinatal infection of human T-lymphotropic virus type I, the etiologic virus of adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma. DNA amplification of specific human T-lymphotropic virus type I sequences.
Immune deficiency in family members of patients with Hodgkin's disease.
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in the elderly. I. Pathologic features at presentation.
Diffuse intermediate lymphocytic lymphoma. A clinicopathologic study and comparison with small lymphocytic lymphoma and diffuse small cleaved cell lymphoma.
Diffuse proliferative lupus nephritis: long-term observations in patients treated with ancrod.
Membranous glomerulonephritis induced by 2-mercaptopropionylglycine (2-MPG).
SLE nephritis: an ultrastructural immunogold study to evaluate the relationship between immune complexes and the basement membrane components type IV collagen, fibronectin and heparan sulphate proteoglycans.
Anaphylactic shock associated with chymopapain skin test. A case report and review of the literature.
HTLV-I viral-associated myelopathy after blood transfusion in a multiple trauma patient.
Monitoring glucocorticoid therapy: a pharmacokinetic approach.
Effect of facial cooling on mucosal blood flow in the mouth in humans.
Undiagnosed tuberculosis in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection
Pulmonary manifestations of disseminated cryptococcosis in patients with AIDS.
Comparison of aerosolized glycopyrrolate and metaproterenol in acute asthma.
Dialysis-induced respiratory acidosis.
Use of Nd:YAG laser in endobronchial Kaposi's sarcoma.
The malignancy-sarcoidosis syndrome.
Multiple alterations in insulin responses to glucose in islets from 48-h glucose-infused nondiabetic rats.
Transfusion risks.
Effect of sleep and sleep deprivation on ventilatory response to bronchoconstriction.
Late-phase bronchial vascular responses in allergic sheep.
Susceptibility to thyroid autoimmune disease: molecular analysis of HLA-D region genes identifies new markers for goitrous Hashimoto's thyroiditis.
Low prevalence of thyrotropin receptor antibody in primary hypothyroidism in Japan.
Adrenal medullitis in type I diabetes.
Thyroiditis as the presenting manifestation of disseminated extrapulmonary Pneumocystis carinii infection.
Computer assisted selection and assessment of antibodies in the diagnosis of lymphomas.
Value of monoclonal anti-myeloperoxidase (MPO7) for diagnosing acute leukaemia.
Identification of human immunodeficiency virus hybridizing sequences in the peripheral blood of a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Autoimmunity and malignancy.
Miliary tuberculosis presenting as skin lesions in a patient with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Disseminated Kaposi's sarcoma not associated with HIV infection in a bisexual man.
Widespread flat warts associated with human papillomavirus type 5: a cutaneous manifestation of human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Serial Doppler echocardiographic follow-up of left ventricular diastolic function in cardiac amyloidosis.
Acute hemorrhagic edema of infancy (AHEI)--a variant of Henoch-Schonlein purpura or a distinct clinical entity?
Role of nasal allergy in chronic maxillary sinusitis--diagnostic value of nasal challenge with allergen.
Characteristics of patients with food-related complaints.
Elevated serum interleukin-6 associated with a failure in B cell differentiation in common variable immunodeficiency.
Immunoblot analysis of sera from patients with allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis: correlation with disease activity.
Basophil histamine release by platelet-activating factor in aspirin-sensitive subjects with asthma.
Prevalence of occupational asthma and immunologic sensitization to guar gum among employees at a carpet-manufacturing plant.
Tryptase, a mediator of human mast cells.
The role of histamine in allergic diseases.
The role of antihistamines in otitis.
The role of antihistamine therapy in vascular headaches.
The use of antihistamines in the prevention and treatment of anaphylaxis and anaphylactoid reactions.
Normal responsiveness of superficial hand veins to alpha- and beta-adrenergic stimuli in allergic asthma: effects of terbutaline and prednisolone on beta-adrenergic responsiveness.
Allergens as proteases: an Aspergillus fumigatus proteinase directly induces human epithelial cell detachment.
It is children with atopic dermatitis who develop asthma more frequently if the mother smokes.
Salsalate cross-sensitivity in aspirin-sensitive patients with asthma.
Immediate skin test reactivity to Food and Drug Administration-approved standardized extracts.
Increased bronchial hyperresponsiveness after inhaling salbutamol during 1 year is not caused by subsensitization to salbutamol.
Down regulation in hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Aberrant regulation of IL-1 expression in macrophages from young autoimmune-prone mice.
Synergistic effect of murine cytomegalovirus on the induction of acute graft-vs-host disease involving MHC class I differences only. Analysis of in vitro T cell function.
A small proportion of cationic antibodies in immune complexes is sufficient to mediate their deposition in glomeruli.
Ultraviolet cross-linking of helical oligonucleotides to two monoclonal MRL-1pr/1pr anti-DNA autoantibodies. Variations in H and L chain binding to DNA.
In vivo immune selection of a Moloney murine leukemia virus-induced tumor results in the loss of viral- but not tumor-associated antigens.
Immunology of AIDS related to psoriasis.
Susceptibility to effects of UVB radiation on induction of contact hypersensitivity as a risk factor for skin cancer in humans.
Heterosexual transmission of human immunodeficiency virus among intravenous drug users.
The role of human immunodeficiency virus infection in pneumococcal bacteremia in San Francisco residents.
Circulating immune complex-associated parasite antigens in human onchocerciasis.
Coccidioidomycosis in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients.
Activation of the complement system in human immunodeficiency virus infection: relevance of the classical pathway to pathogenesis and disease severity.
AZT demonstrates anti-HIV-1 activity in persistently infected cell lines: implications for combination chemotherapy and immunotherapy.
Analysis of lymphocytes, monocytes, and neutrophils from human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected persons for HIV DNA.
Quantitative detection of brain aberrations in human immunodeficiency virus type 1-infected individuals by magnetic resonance imaging.
Seroprevalence of human T cell leukemia viruses in selected populations of homosexual men.
Confocal microscopic detection of human immunodeficiency virus RNA-producing cells.
Frequency of indeterminate western blot tests in healthy adults at low risk for human immunodeficiency virus infection. The NIAID AIDS Vaccine Clinical Trails Network.
Serum immunoglobulins E and G anti-Aspergillus fumigatus antibody in patients with cystic fibrosis who have allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis.
Unusual lymphoproliferative oropharyngeal lesions in heart and heart-lung transplant recipients.
Mid-line presentation of cervical lymphomata.
Determination of human immunodeficiency virus antibody status in forensic autopsy cases in Vancouver using a recombinant immunoblot assay.
Causes of death in hospitalized intravenous drug abusers.
Psychological functioning in a cohort of gay men at risk for AIDS. A three-year descriptive study.
Headaches and multiple sclerosis: a clinical study and review of the literature.
Serial studies of evoked potentials and circulating lymphocyte subsets for multiple sclerosis: attempts to monitor progress.
Treatment of metastatic melanoma with an autologous tumor-cell vaccine: clinical and immunologic results in 64 patients.
An early phase II study of CPT-11: a new derivative of camptothecin, for the treatment of leukemia and lymphoma.
Gallium-67 imaging: a predictor of residual tumor viability and clinical outcome in patients with diffuse large-cell lymphoma.
Magnetic resonance imaging contrast agents: theory and application to the central nervous system.
Toxoplasmosis of the conus medullaris in a patient with hemophilia A-associated AIDS. Case report.
Needlestick injuries among resident physicians.
Sexual practices: are physicians addressing the issues?
Dideoxycytidine alone and in an alternating schedule with zidovudine in children with symptomatic human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Evaluation of the AIDS dementia complex in clinical trials.
Evaluation of active control trials in AIDS.
Testicular carcinoma in patients positive and at risk for human immunodeficiency virus.
HIV infection, pregnant women, and newborns. A policy proposal for information and testing. Working Group on HIV Testing of Pregnant Women and Newborns
Anaphylaxis following ingestion of a psyllium-containing cereal.
The HIV-testing policies of US hospitals
Practicalities of lipids: ICU patient, autoimmune disease, and vascular disease.
Parathyroid hormone-related peptide in plasma of patients with hypercalcemia and malignant lesions
Diagnosis of malignant cardiac disease by endomyocardial biopsy
Type-specific antigens for serological discrimination of HTLV-I and HTLV-II infection.
Protection against allergen-induced asthma by salmeterol.
Infective dermatitis of Jamaican children: a marker for HTLV-I infection
Angiotensin-converting-enzyme inhibitors and anaphylactoid reactions to high-flux membrane dialysis
Primary central nervous system lymphoma in patients with and without the acquired immune deficiency syndrome. A retrospective analysis and review of the literature.
Disseminated histoplasmosis in the acquired immune deficiency syndrome: clinical findings, diagnosis and treatment, and review of the literature.
Coccidioidomycosis during human immunodeficiency virus infection. A review of 77 patients.
Extrapulmonary pneumocystosis: clinical features in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Corticosteroids as adjunctive therapy for severe Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. A double-blind, placebo-controlled trial.
A controlled trial of early adjunctive treatment with corticosteroids for Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. California Collaborative Treatment Group.
The agent of bacillary angiomatosis. An approach to the identification of uncultured pathogens
Clinical and pathological features of bacillary peliosis hepatis in association with human immunodeficiency virus infection
A newly recognized fastidious gram-negative pathogen as a cause of fever and bacteremia
HIV-1 tropism for mononuclear phagocytes can be determined by regions of gp120 outside the CD4-binding domain.
Circulating CD8+ cytotoxic T lymphocytes specific for HTLV-I pX in patients with HTLV-I associated neurological disease.
Cytokine accumulations in CSF of multiple sclerosis patients: frequent detection of interleukin-1 and tumor necrosis factor but not interleukin-6.
Proton magnetic resonance spectroscopy in multiple sclerosis.
Myelin basic protein-specific T lymphocyte lines from MS patients and healthy individuals.
A comparison of regulatory cells in spinal fluid and blood in patients with multiple sclerosis and other neurologic diseases.
HLA associations and ancestry in Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada disease and sympathetic ophthalmia.
The prevalence of cardiac valvular pathosis in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Oral histoplasmosis as a presenting disease in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome [published erratum appears in Oral Surg Oral Med Oral Pathol 1991 Jan;71(1):76]
Immunoglobulin G subclass deficiency and predisposition to infection in Down's syndrome.
Prevalence of human immunodeficiency virus seropositivity in pediatric emergency room patients undergoing phlebotomy.
Pediatric acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: an unusually high incidence of twinning.
Cytomegalovirus. An update for primary care physicians.
Myelin autoreactivity in multiple sclerosis: recognition of myelin basic protein in the context of HLA-DR2 products by T lymphocytes of multiple-sclerosis patients and healthy donors.
Transforming growth factor beta and noncytopathic mechanisms of immunodeficiency in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Organ-specific and systemic autoimmune diseases originate from defects in hematopoietic stem cells.
Rapid, nonradioactive detection of clonal T-cell receptor gene rearrangements in lymphoid neoplasms.
A 47-kDa human nuclear protein recognized by antikinetochore autoimmune sera is homologous with the protein encoded by RCC1, a gene implicated in onset of chromosome condensation.
Pharmacotherapy of asthma and allergic rhinitis.
Adrenal dysfunction in patients with renal amyloid.
Interferon system and natural killer cell activity in myasthenia gravis.
Tuberculous psoas muscle abscess following chemoprophylaxis with isoniazid in a patient with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Spectrum of Cryptococcus neoformans infection in 68 patients infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Tropical neuromyelopathies and retroviruses: a review.
Current advances in the diagnosis and treatment of AIDS: an introduction.
Laboratory methods in the diagnosis and prognostic staging of infection with human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
Management of the hematologic complications of human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Therapeutic approaches to neoplasms in AIDS.
New antiretroviral agents in the clinic.
Cytomegalovirus: where have we been and where are we going?
Epidemiology of cytomegalovirus infections.
Successful strategy for prevention of cytomegalovirus interstitial pneumonia after human leukocyte antigen-identical bone marrow transplantation.
Cytomegalovirus in the setting of infection with human immunodeficiency virus
Cytomegalovirus infection in children with AIDS.
Syphilis, human immunodeficiency virus infection, and targeting prevention.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia manifested as a hilar mass and cavitary lesion: an atypical presentation in a patient receiving aerosolized pentamidine prophylaxis.
Synchronous Hodgkin's disease and myelofibrosis terminating with granulocytic sarcoma and acute megakaryocytic leukemia.
Hypercalcemia as a clinical prodrome to lymphoma.
Cataract extraction in uveitis patients.
Stroke in systemic lupus erythematosus [published erratum appears in Stroke 1991 Mar;22(3):417]
Surgical experience with cerebral amyloid angiopathy.
The prevalence of antibody to HTLV-I/II in United States plasma donors and in United States and French hemophiliacs.
Efficiency of white cell filtration and a freeze-thaw procedure for removal of HIV-infected cells from blood.
HIV disease: a review for the family physician. Part II. Secondary infections, malignancy and experimental therapy.
Tartrazine sensitivity.
Antinuclear matrix antibody. Hidden antinuclear antibody in patients with connective tissue diseases.
Racial, social, and environmental risks for childhood asthma.
Immune complexes in pediatric human immunodeficiency virus infection.
A double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of intravenous immunoglobulin therapy in patients with chronic fatigue syndrome
Beta 2-microglobulin predicts survival in primary systemic amyloidosis.
Pulmonary disease in AIDS patients.
Ocular adnexal Kaposi's sarcoma in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Hodgkin's disease and CD30-positive anaplastic large cell lymphomas--a continuous spectrum of malignant disorders. A quantitative morphometric and immunohistologic study.
Histologic similarity of murine colonic graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) to human colonic GVHD and inflammatory bowel disease.
Protein A-gold immunoelectron microscopic study of amyloid fibrils, granular deposits, and fibrillar luminal aggregates in renal amyloidosis.
Modeling the impact of breast-feeding by HIV-infected women on child survival [published erratum appears in Am J Public Health 1991 May;81(5):658-9]
The buddy volunteer commitment in AIDS care.
Epidemiology of reported cases of AIDS in lesbians, United States 1980-89.
Association of hepatitis B surface antigen and core antibody with acquisition and manifestations of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) infection.
The AIDS-related experiences and practices of primary care physicians in Los Angeles: 1984-89.
Evaluation of the efficacy and cost effectiveness of health education methods to increase medication adherence among adults with asthma.
Human T cell lymphotropic virus infection in Guaymi Indians from Panama.
High incidence of viral hepatitis among American missionaries in Africa.
Effect of education on the use of universal precautions in a university hospital emergency department.
Prehospital administration of inhaled metaproterenol.
IgG1-mediated acute pulmonary hypersensitivity response in the guinea pig. Involvement of specific lipid mediators.
Human basophil releasability. VI. Changes in basophil releasability in patients with allergic rhinitis or bronchial asthma.
Asthmatic airways have a disproportionate hyperresponsiveness to LTE4, as compared with normal airways, but not to LTC4, LTD4, methacholine, and histamine.
Bronchial responsiveness to histamine in infants and older children
Formoterol, a new inhaled beta-2 adrenergic agonist, has a longer blocking effect than albuterol on hyperventilation-induced bronchoconstriction.
Circadian basis of the late asthmatic response.
Clearance of 99mTc-DTPA in pigeon fancier's hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Computerized tomography in the evaluation of allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis.
Infection with human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) among recipients of antibody-positive blood donations
Risk for occupational transmission of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) associated with clinical exposures. A prospective evaluation
Effect of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection on the course of syphilis and on the response to treatment.
Stroke in pediatric acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Increased MEPP frequency as an early sign of experimental immune-mediated motoneuron disease.
MY7 monoclonal antibody for diagnosis of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma.
Characterization of the dermal infiltrate in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients with psoriasis.
Profile of bronchospastic disease in Puerto Rican patients in New York City. A possible relationship to alpha 1-antitrypsin variants.
Sulfadiazine crystalluria revisited. The treatment of Toxoplasma encephalitis in patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Recurrent meningitis in a patient with congenital deficiency of the C9 component of complement. First case of C9 deficiency in Europe.
Extrahepatic biliary obstruction by lymphoma.
Asthma and eczema in children born to women with migraine.
Evidence for impaired T cell DNA methylation in systemic lupus erythematosus and rheumatoid arthritis.
Association of labial salivary gland histopathology with clinical and serologic features of connective tissue diseases.
Nontropical pyomyositis as a cause of subacute, multifocal myalgia in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Rescue of interleukin-1 activity by leucovorin following inhibition by methotrexate in a murine in vitro system.
Medical and dental students' attitudes about the AIDS epidemic.
The impact of an AIDS symposium on attitudes of providers of pediatric health care.
Attitudes of medical school faculty and students toward acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Medical and nursing students' attitudes about AIDS issues.
Predictors of medical and nursing students' levels of HIV-AIDS knowledge and their resistance to working with AIDS patients.
Willingness of health-professions students to treat patients with AIDS.
Silent infections with human immunodeficiency virus type 1 are highly unlikely in multitransfused seronegative hemophiliacs.
Serum soluble interleukin-2 receptor is associated with clinical and pathologic disease status in hairy cell leukemia
Differentiating agents facilitate infection of myeloid leukemia cell lines by monocytotropic HIV-1 strains [published erratum appears in Blood 1991 Apr 1;77(7):1624]
Induction of in vitro graft-versus-leukemia activity following bone marrow transplantation for chronic myeloid leukemia.
Expression of P-glycoprotein in adult T-cell leukemia cells.
Cell membrane expression and functional role of the p75 subunit of interleukin-2 receptor in lymphoproliferative disease of granular lymphocytes.
Association of bcl-1 rearrangements with lymphocytic lymphoma of intermediate differentiation.
Response patterns of hairy cell leukemia to B-cell mitogens and growth factors.
Airway hyperresponsiveness in patients with microvascular angina. Evidence for a diffuse disorder of smooth muscle responsiveness.
Evaluation and treatment of mental disorders in patients with AIDS.
Intestinal perforation due to cytomegalovirus infection in patients with AIDS.
Anal ulcerations due to cytomegalovirus in patients with AIDS. Report of six cases.
Sexually transmitted diseases of the colon, rectum, and anus. The challenge of the nineties.
A novel X-linked combined immunodeficiency disease.
Mapping of a functional autoimmune epitope on the beta 1-adrenergic receptor in patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
The HIV cytopathic effect: potential target for therapy?
Mathematical models of HIV infection. I. Threshold conditions for transmission and host survival.
Predominance of polymorphonuclear leukocytes in cerebrospinal fluid of AIDS patients with cytomegalovirus polyradiculomyelitis.
Isolation of HIV-1 from the blood of seropositive adults: patient stage of illness and sample inoculum size are major determinants of a positive culture. The Walter Reed Retroviral Research Group.
Tracking the spread of the HIV infection epidemic among young adults in the United States: results of the first four years of screening among civilian applicants for U.S. military service.
Relapse from safer sex: the next challenge for AIDS prevention efforts.
Seroprevalence of HIV-2 infection in Greece (Crete).
Seroprevalence of HIV infection in the general population of the Cote d'Ivoire, West Africa.
Suppressive effects of morphine pellet implants on in vivo parameters of immune function.
Otologic disease in AIDS patients: CT correlation.
Ocular syphilis.
Acute syphilitic posterior placoid chorioretinitis.
Toxoplasma gondii retinochoroiditis and optic neuritis in acquired immune deficiency syndrome. Report of a case.
Immunoblastic T-cell lymphoma presenting as an eyelid tumor.
Treating systemic fungal infections in AIDS patients. Prolonging life against the odds.
Virologic and immunologic aspects of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Lymphoma presenting as a periorbital tumor.
Secondary T-cell lymphoproliferation after marrow transplantation.
Primary lymphoma of the central nervous system in two children with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Angiocentric lymphoma with histologic features of neoplastic angioendotheliomatosis presenting with predominant respiratory and hematologic manifestations. Report of a case and review of the literature
Lymphangiomyomatosis--newer concepts in pathogenesis and management--case reports.
Masqueraders in clinical allergy: laryngeal dysfunction causing dyspnea [published erratum appears in Ann Allergy 1991 Jan;66(1):22]
Silk-induced asthma in children: a report of 64 cases.
Low level atmospheric sulfur dioxide pollution and childhood asthma.
A random double-blind trial of the combination of nebulized atropine methylnitrate and albuterol in nocturnal asthma.
Effect of procaterol on arterial blood gas in asthmatic children.
Evaluation of ketotifen in corticosteroid-dependent idiopathic anaphylaxis.
Type I hypersensitivity to rubber.
Anaphylaxis to grand keyhole limpet (abalone-like shellfish) and abalone.
Diagnosis of mold allergy by RAST and skin prick testing.
Lymphomatoid granulomatosis presenting as ulcerodestructive gastrointestinal tract lesions in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection. A new association.
Intrahepatic cholestasis due to hypersensitivity reaction to procainamide.
Vitreous amyloidosis associated with homozygosity for the transthyretin methionine-30 gene.
Hereditary cerebral haemorrhage with amyloidosis--Dutch type. Magnetic resonance imaging findings in 7 cases.
A study of immunoglobulin G in the cerebrospinal fluid of 1007 patients with suspected neurological disease using isoelectric focusing and the Log IgG-Index. A comparison and diagnostic applications.
Breakdown of the blood-brain barrier precedes symptoms and other MRI signs of new lesions in multiple sclerosis. Pathogenetic and clinical implications.
Transfusion-induced graft-versus-host disease in patients with malignant lymphoma. A case report and review of the literature.
Angiocentric immunoproliferative lesion/T-cell non-Hodgkin's lymphoma and the acquired immune deficiency syndrome: a case report and review of the literature.
Splenic rupture in a human immunodeficiency virus-infected patient with primary splenic lymphoma.
Disseminated strongyloidiasis with central nervous system involvement diagnosed antemortem in a patient with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and Burkitts lymphoma.
Risks of human immunodeficiency virus infection to patients and healthcare personnel.
Cardiac involvement in AIDS.
Inhaled albuterol and oral prednisone therapy in hospitalized adult asthmatics. Does aminophylline add any benefit?
Diagnostic value of maximal exercise tidal volume.
Predicting the need for hospitalization in children with acute asthma.
Atypical presentations of Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in patients receiving inhaled pentamidine prophylaxis.
Clinical dysautonomia in patients with bronchial asthma. Study with seven autonomic function tests.
Effect of inhaled methacholine on inspiratory flow.
Pathologic dependence of oxygen consumption on oxygen delivery in acute respiratory failure secondary to AIDS-related Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
Pneumothorax following cytotoxic chemotherapy in malignant lymphoma.
Rapid oral desensitization to isoniazid and rifampin.
Permanent venous access via subcutaneous infusion port in severe asthma.
Insulin-mimicking anti-idiotypic antibodies in development of spontaneous autoimmune diabetes in BB/E rats.
Light microscopic diagnosis of human microsporidiosis and variable response to octreotide.
Late pulmonary allergic responses in actively but not passively IgE-sensitized rats.
Tachyphylaxis to inhaled methacholine in normal but not asthmatic subjects.
Effect of thromboxane antagonists on ozone-induced airway responses in dogs.
Serologic, biologic, and western blot analysis of a T suppressor factor with specificity for the hapten 4-hydroxy-3-nitrophenyl acetyl derived from serum-free medium.
Epitope mapping of human thyroglobulin. Heterogeneous recognition by thyroid pathologic sera.
IgG antibodies from patients with bullous pemphigoid bind to localized epitopes on synthetic peptides encoded by bullous pemphigoid antigen cDNA.
Recognition of a B cell lymphoma by anti-idiotypic T cells.
Chronic sinusitis and the yellow nail syndrome.
Value of a multiantigen radioallergosorbent test in diagnosing atopic disease in young children.
Effect of continuous-infusion zidovudine therapy on neuropsychologic functioning in children with symptomatic human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Vaginitis emphysematosa. A report of four cases.
Chancroid and the role of genital ulcer disease in the spread of human retroviruses.
Genital herpes simplex virus infections.
Sexually transmitted arthritis syndromes.
The interrelationship between human immunodeficiency virus infection and other sexually transmitted diseases.
Regular inhaled beta-agonist treatment in bronchial asthma
Bronchodilator, cardiovascular, and hypokalaemic effects of fenoterol, salbutamol, and terbutaline in asthma.
A randomized, double-blind trial of nystatin therapy for the candidiasis hypersensitivity syndrome
Paraneoplastic pemphigus. An autoimmune mucocutaneous disease associated with neoplasia.
The effects of a 5-lipoxygenase inhibitor on asthma induced by cold, dry air
Biology of retroviruses. Detection, molecular biology, and treatment of retroviral infection.
Epidemiology of human immunodeficiency virus infection in women in the United States.
AIDS. Natural history and prognosis.
Primary care of women infected with the human immunodeficiency virus.
Human immunodeficiency virus education and screening of prenatal patients.
Influence of human immunodeficiency virus infection on reproductive decisions.
The immunology of HIV disease and pregnancy and possible interactions.
Role of the placenta in perinatal transmission of HIV.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection in pregnancy.
HIV infection. Managing exposure risks for the obstetrician/gynecologist.
Care of the infant born exposed to human immunodeficiency virus.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection, women, and pregnancy. Ethical issues.
Selective induction of toxicity to human cells expressing human immunodeficiency virus type 1 Tat by a conditionally cytotoxic adenovirus vector.
Epstein-Barr virus small nuclear RNAs are not expressed in permissively infected cells in AIDS-associated leukoplakia.
Putative tyrosine kinases expressed in K-562 human leukemia cells.
Use of inhaled corticosteroids in patients with mild asthma.
Do large volume spacer devices reduce the systemic effects of high dose inhaled corticosteroids?
Granulomatous Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in a patient with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Bronchoalveolar lavage via a modified stomach tube in intubated patients with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and diffuse pneumonia.
Primary lymphoma of prostate: transrectal ultrasonic appearance.
Current report--HIV. AIDS at the crossroads: a report from the 1990 International Conference on AIDS--San Francisco.
Hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Nylon suture toxicity after vitrectomy surgery.
Bronchial asthma and acid reflux into the distal and proximal oesophagus.
The significance of Leu 8 negative T cells in lymphoid skin infiltrates: malignant transformation, selective homing or T-cell activation?
Immediate contact reactions to chemicals in the fragrance mix and a study of the quenching action of eugenol.
Enhanced percutaneous absorption of a novel topical cyclosporin A formulation and assessment of its immunosuppressive activity.
Five year prospective study of HIV infection in the Edinburgh haemophiliac cohort
Primary central nervous system lymphoma in a pediatric patient with acquired immune deficiency syndrome. Treatment with radiation therapy.
Histopathologic, immunophenotypic, and genotypic analysis of Ki-1 anaplastic large cell lymphomas that express histiocyte-associated antigens.
Primary breast lymphoma. An immunohistologic study of 20 new cases.
Primary malignant lymphomas of the spleen. A morphologic and immunohistochemical analysis of 17 cases.
Pulmonary problems in pregnancy.
IgG subclasses in the serum and skin in subacute cutaneous lupus erythematosus and neonatal lupus erythematosus.
Monoclonal antibodies to immunogenic lymphoma cell variants displaying impaired neoplastic properties: characterization and applications.
History of cigarette smoking and risk of leukemia and myeloma: results from the Adventist health study.
Lipolytic factors associated with murine and human cancer cachexia.
Effects of the differentiating agent hexamethylene bisacetamide on normal and myelodysplastic hematopoietic progenitors.
Novel primitive lymphoid tumours induced in transgenic mice by cooperation between myc and bcl-2.
Bcl-2 is an inner mitochondrial membrane protein that blocks programmed cell death.
Annual summary of vital statistics--1989.
Interleukin-2 immunotherapy in children.
Mapping chromosome band 11q23 in human acute leukemia with biotinylated probes: identification of 11q23 translocation breakpoints with a yeast artificial chromosome.
AIDS, minority patients, and doctors: what's the risk? Who's talking?
Cardiovascular anomalies associated with prenatal exposure to theophylline.
Helicobacter pylori infection in patients with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Avascular necrosis of bone: a common serious complication of allogeneic bone marrow transplantation.
Determinants of condom use among French heterosexuals with multiple partners.
Disease control priorities in developing countries: health policy responses to epidemiological change.
AIDS-related knowledge, sexual behavior, and condom use among men and women in Kinshasa, Zaire.
The course of the HIV epidemic among intravenous drug users in Amsterdam, The Netherlands.
The impact of HIV-related illness on employment.
Kaposi's sarcoma of the rectum in patients with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Severe anemia is an important negative predictor for survival with disseminated Mycobacterium avium-intracellulare in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome [published erratum appears in Am Rev Respir Dis 1991 Feb;143(2):451]
Genetics of asthma and hay fever in Australian twins.
Prevalence of occupational asthma and immunologic sensitization to psyllium among health personnel in chronic care hospitals.
Comparative airway response to inhaled bradykinin, kallidin, and [des-Arg9]bradykinin in normal and asthmatic subjects.
Identification of activated T lymphocytes and eosinophils in bronchial biopsies in stable atopic asthma.
A national study of AIDS and residency training: experiences, concerns, and consequences
Treatment of spasticity with botulinum toxin: a double-blind study.
Cerebrospinal fluid neopterin in human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection.
HTLV-I sequences are not detected in peripheral blood genomic DNA or in brain cDNA of multiple sclerosis patients.
Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-associated myopathy: immunocytochemical identification of an HIV antigen (gp 41) in muscle macrophages.
Effect of digitalis on clinical symptoms and conduction variables in patients with multiple sclerosis.
Lymphoproliferative disorders associated with carbamazepine.
Monocytoid B-cell lymphoma in a patient with human immunodeficiency virus infection. Demonstration of human immunodeficiency virus sequences in paraffin-embedded lymph node sections by polymerase chain reaction amplification.
Pulmonary malakoplakia in a patient with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. Differential diagnostic considerations.
Stereotactic biopsy of an active multiple sclerosis lesion. Immunocytochemical analysis and neuropathologic correlation with magnetic resonance imaging.
Reduced cerebral blood flow in early stages of human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Genomic divergence of an HIV-2 from a German AIDS patient probably infected in Mali.
Response of mononuclear cells from HIV-infected patients to B-cell mitogens: correlation with immunological and clinical features of disease progression.
Rapid and specific diagnosis of HIV-1 and HIV-2 infections: an evaluation of testing strategies.
AIDS following mother-to-child transmission of HIV-2.
An analysis of the economic impact of HIV infection among patients at Mama Yemo Hospital, Kinshasa, Zaire.
Differences in knowledge of and risk factors for AIDS between Hispanic and non-Hispanic women attending an urban family planning clinic.
High HIV risk-taking among young gay men.
Prevention of perinatal HIV transmission: are there alternatives to pre-pregnancy serological screening in Kinshasa, Zaire?
Detection of HIV in fetal central nervous system tissue.
Immunology of HIV infection, I: Biology of the interferons.
Morphine-induced transactivation of HIV-1 LTR in human neuroblastoma cells.
Naturally occurring HIV-1 isolates with differences in replicative capacity are distinguished by in situ hybridization of infected cells.
Search for epitope-specific antibody responses to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV-1) envelope glycoproteins signifying resistance to disease development.
A semiquantitative microassay for measurement of relative number of blood mononuclear cells infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Cumulative AIDS incidence and altered mortality from bacterial infections.
Anti TSH-receptor antibodies in pregnant patients with autoimmune thyroid disorder.
Amyloidosis associated bleeding diatheses in the surgical patient.
Development of acute myelocytic leukemia in patients with Crohn's disease.
Massive hepatic infarction in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Epstein-Barr virus associated oesophageal ulcers in AIDS.
Metabolic studies of radioiodinated serum amyloid P component in normal subjects and patients with systemic amyloidosis.
Widespread dermatophyte infections that mimic collagen vascular disease.
Parasympathetic nervous system activity in hypothyroidism determined by R-R interval variations on electrocardiogram.
A method of pharmacoepidemiologic analysis that uses computerized Medicaid.
A phase I study of recombinant human interferon-alpha 2a or human lymphoblastoid interferon-alpha n1 and concomitant zidovudine in patients with AIDS-related Kaposi's sarcoma.
Orthostatic hypotension in human immunodeficiency virus infection may be the result of generalized autonomic nervous system dysfunction.
Is the incubation period of AIDS lengthening?
Cigarette smoking: a modifier of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection?
Epidemiology of acquired immune deficiency syndrome in persons aged 50 years or older.
Defective expression of p70/75 interleukin 2 receptor in T cells from patients with systemic lupus erythematosus: a possible defect in the process of increased intracellular calcium leading to p70/75 expression.
Anti-RNA polymerase I antibodies in the urine of patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Clinical significance of antibodies to a 68 kDa U1RNP polypeptide in connective tissue disease.
The spondyloarthropathies in Zimbabwe: a clinical and immunogenetic profile.
Diagnostic criteria for neuropsychiatric systemic lupus erythematosus: the results of a consensus meeting. The Ad Hoc Neuropsychiatric Lupus Workshop Group.
Diclofenac induced immune thrombocytopenia.
Severe cerebral and systemic necrotizing vasculitis developing during pregnancy in a case of systemic lupus erythematosus.
Rectourethral fistula caused by Kaposi's sarcoma.
A lethal complication of papaverine-induced priapism.
Environmental illness. A controlled study of 26 subjects with '20th century disease'
T-cell-directed hepatocyte damage in autoimmune chronic active hepatitis.
Serological and molecular survey for HTLV-I infection in a high-risk Middle Eastern group.
A randomized study of the effect of withdrawing hydroxychloroquine sulfate in systemic lupus erythematosus. The Canadian Hydroxychloroquine Study Group
Human T-cell leukemia virus type I infection as an oncogenic and prognostic risk factor in cervical and vaginal carcinoma.
Large cell orbital lymphoma in a patient with acquired immune deficiency syndrome. Case report and review
Asymptomatic and neurologically symptomatic HIV-seropositive individuals: prospective evaluation with cranial MR imaging.
Hemodialysis-related amyloidomas of bone.
MR imaging of blood-borne liver metastases in mice: contrast enhancement with Fe-EHPG.
Bronchial hyperresponsiveness in young students of southern China: relation to respiratory symptoms, diagnosed asthma, and risk factors.
A general practice based survey of bronchial hyperresponsiveness and its relation to symptoms, sex, age, atopy, and smoking.
Dietary alpha-linolenic acid and immunocompetence in humans.
Rice pollen allergy in Taiwan.
Asthma and pregnancy: responsibility of physicians and patients
Anaphylaxis to pinon nuts
Bronchial challenge to house dust can induce immediate bronchoconstriction in allergic asthmatic patients.
Relationship between asthma and seasonal allergic rhinitis in schoolchildren.
Outcome of prophylactic therapy for idiopathic anaphylaxis.
Regressing atypical histiocytosis. Aberrant prothymocyte differentiation, T-cell receptor gene rearrangements, and nodal involvement.
Bone marrow transplantation with interleukin-2-activated bone marrow followed by interleukin-2 therapy for acute myeloid leukemia in mice.
Direct relationship between remission duration in acute myeloid leukemia and cell cycle kinetics: a leukemia intergroup study.
Different effect of benzylacyclouridine on the toxic and therapeutic effects of azidothymidine in mice.
Induction of interleukin-6 during human immunodeficiency virus infection.
CD11c (LEU-M5) expression characterizes a B-cell chronic lymphoproliferative disorder with features of both chronic lymphocytic leukemia and hairy cell leukemia.
Combined syngeneic bone marrow transplantation and immunotherapy of a murine B-cell lymphoma: active immunization with tumor-derived idiotypic immunoglobulin.
Specific antibody response to the mycobacterial 65 kDa stress protein in ankylosing spondylitis and rheumatoid arthritis.
The lack of relationship between acetylator phenotype and idiopathic systemic lupus erythematosus in a South-east Asian population: a study of Indians, Malays and Malaysian Chinese.
Postpartum renal failure in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Association of autoimmune hepatitis with HLA-Bw54 and DR4 in Japanese patients.
The human hepatic asialoglycoprotein receptor is a target antigen for liver-infiltrating T cells in autoimmune chronic active hepatitis and primary biliary cirrhosis.
Quantitative analysis of serum IL-6 and its correlation with increased levels of serum IL-2R in HIV-induced diseases.
Evidence by peptide mapping that the region CD4(81-92) is involved in gp120/CD4 interaction leading to HIV infection and HIV-induced syncytium formation.
Immunodominance in the graft-vs-host disease T cell response to minor histocompatibility antigens.
Human and murine anti-DNA antibodies induce the production of anti-idiotypic antibodies with autoantigen-binding properties (epibodies) through immune-network interactions.
Aberrant expression of cytokine genes in peritoneal macrophages from mice infected with LP-BM5 MuLV, a murine model of AIDS.
Induction of NF-KB during monocyte differentiation by HIV type 1 infection.
B cell activation during HIV-1 infection. II. Cell-to-cell interactions and cytokine requirement.
IgE-dependent cytokine production by human peripheral blood mononuclear phagocytes.
Interferon in the treatment of AIDS-associated Kaposi's sarcoma: the American experience.
Photochemotherapy alone or combined with interferon alpha-2a in the treatment of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma.
Recombinant IFN-alpha in lymphomas.
Serologic discrimination of human T cell lymphotropic virus infection by using a synthetic peptide-based enzyme immunoassay.
Detection of anti-Epstein-Barr virus trans-activator (ZEBRA) antibodies in sera from patients with human immunodeficiency virus.
Use of a new CD4-positive HeLa cell clone for direct quantitation of infectious human immunodeficiency virus from blood cells of AIDS patients.
Iopamidol myelography: morbidity in patients with previous intolerance to iodine derivatives.
Elevated expression of the c-fes proto-oncogene in adult human myeloid leukemia cells in the absence of gene amplification.
Headache and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Syringomyelia secondary to compression of the cervical spinal cord by an extramedullary lymphoma.
Controlled trial of a home and ambulatory program for asthmatic children.
Sympathomimetics for acute severe asthma: should only beta 2-selective agonists be used?
Malignant lymphomas in cynomolgus monkeys infected with simian immunodeficiency virus.
Discordant expression of antigens between intraepidermal and intradermal T cells in mycosis fungoides.
Glucocorticoid level and neuropsychiatric symptoms in homosexual men with HIV infection.
Systemic lupus erythematosus after renal transplantation: patient and graft survival and disease activity. The Dutch Working Party on Systemic Lupus Erythematosus
Elevated soluble interleukin-2 receptor levels in patients with active multiple sclerosis.
Stiff-man syndrome: a GABAergic autoimmune disorder with autoantigenic heterogeneity.
HLA antigens in juvenile arthritis. Pauciarticular and polyarticular juvenile arthritis are immunogenetically distinct.
Antihistone antibodies in antinuclear antibody-positive juvenile arthritis.
Adrenal insufficiency in two women with anticardiolipin antibodies. Cause and effect?
Systemic lupus erythematosus in a boy with chronic granulomatous disease: case report and review of the literature.
Seronegative juvenile rheumatoid arthritis and mast cell-associated gastritis.
Restoration of the DNA binding activity of estrogen receptor in MRL-lpr/lpr mice by a polyamine biosynthesis inhibitor.
Antibody profile of early HTLV-I infection [published erratum appears in Lancet 1990 Dec 22-29;336(8730):1596]
Impact of maternal HIV infection on obstetrical and early neonatal outcome.
Monitoring HIV trends in injecting drug users: an Italian experience.
AIDS in the minds of Swedish people: 1986-1989.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia treated with eflornithine in AIDS patients resistant to conventional therapy.
Seroepidemiology of HIV-1 infection in a Catalonian penitentiary.
Human cytomegalovirus viraemia in HIV-1-seropositive patients at various clinical stages of infection.
Complement-mediated enhancement of HIV-1 infection of the monoblastoid cell line U937.
Immunological and serological markers predictive of progression to AIDS in a cohort of HIV-infected drug users.
Immunological changes in primary HIV-1 infection.
Heterosexual transmission of HIV-1 among employees and their spouses at two large businesses in Zaire.
HIV-1 and pregnant women: associated factors, prevalence, estimate of incidence and role in fetal wastage in central Africa.
Transition dynamics of HIV disease in a cohort of African prostitutes: a Markov model approach.
Factors influencing outcome of treatment with zidovudine of patients with AIDS in Australia. The Australian Zidovudine Study Group.
Recreational drug use and sexual behavior change in a cohort of homosexual men. The Multicenter AIDS Cohort Study (MACS).
Neuropsychometric performance of asymptomatic HIV-infected subjects.
Sleep disturbances in HIV-infected homosexual men.
Infection of cynomolgus monkeys with HIV-2 protects against pathogenic consequences of a subsequent simian immunodeficiency virus infection.
Enhancement of erythrocytic adenosine deaminase following treatment of AIDS-related complex/AIDS patients with zidovudine.
World Health Organization quality assessment programme on HIV testing.
Ventricular tachycardia in two patients with AIDS receiving ganciclovir (DHPG).
Poverty and HIV seropositivity: the poor are more likely to be infected.
Toxicity and efficacy of anti-T-cell ricin toxin A chain immunotoxins in a murine model of established graft-versus-host disease induced across the major histocompatibility barrier.
Observations on the effect of chimeric anti-CD4 monoclonal antibody in patients with mycosis fungoides.
Use of leukocyte-depleted platelet concentrates for the prevention of refractoriness and primary HLA alloimmunization: a prospective, randomized trial.
Course of HIV-I infection in a cohort of homosexual and bisexual men: an 11 year follow up study.
The evolving role of etoposide in the management of lymphomas and Hodgkin's disease.
Etoposide in acute leukemia. Past experience and future perspectives.
Total hip arthroplasty in ankylosing spondylitis.
Pulmonary surveillance using bronchoscopy and bronchoalveolar lavage during high-dose antineoplastic therapy.
The chest roentgenogram in pulmonary tuberculosis patients seropositive for human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia. Rare cause of hemoptysis.
Metered dose inhalers for bronchodilator delivery in intubated, mechanically ventilated patients.
Longitudinal study of near fatal asthma.
Relationships with AIDS patients: clinical metaphors and preventive bioethics.
Anorectal sensory and motor function in neurogenic fecal incontinence. Comparison between multiple sclerosis and diabetes mellitus.
Granulocytic sarcoma of the colon.
Latent HIV-1 infection in enriched populations of blood monocytes and T cells from seropositive patients.
Bone marrow stromal cell changes in haematological malignancies.
Interleukin-1 is released at sites of human cutaneous allergic reactions.
Alpha- and beta-adrenergic-receptor systems in bronchial asthma and in subjects without asthma: reduced mononuclear cell beta-receptors in bronchial asthma.
Relationship between the early, late, and rechallenge reaction to nasal challenge with antigen: observations on the role of inflammatory mediators and cells.
Determination of N-methylhistamine in urine as an indicator of histamine release in immediate allergic reactions.
Allergen dose response and late symptoms in a human model of ocular allergy.
Elevated serum concentrations of IgE antibodies to environmental antigens in HIV-seropositive male homosexuals.
1,25-Dihydroxyvitamin D3 potentiates the decreased response of lymphocytes from atopic subjects to agents that increase intracellular cyclic adenosine monophosphate.
Comparison of the effect of loratadine on the airway and skin responses to histamine, methacholine, and allergen in subjects with asthma.
Altered production of histamine-releasing factor (HRF) activity and responsiveness to HRF after immunotherapy in children with asthma.
Allergy to different fish species in cod-allergic children: in vivo and in vitro studies.
Comparison of the effects of inhaled corticosteroids on the airway response to histamine, methacholine, hyperventilation, and sulfur dioxide in subjects with asthma.
Physiologic responses to intranasal dose-response challenges with histamine, methacholine, bradykinin, and prostaglandin in adult volunteers with and without nasal allergy.
Selective desensitization to seminal plasma protein fractions after immunotherapy for postcoital anaphylaxis.
Cetirizine: antiallergic therapy beyond traditional H1 antihistamines.
AIDS: family physicians' attitudes and experiences
High survival rate in advanced-stage B-cell lymphomas and leukemias without CNS involvement with a short intensive polychemotherapy: results from the French Pediatric Oncology Society of a randomized trial of 216 children.
P-glycoprotein expression in malignant lymphoma and reversal of clinical drug resistance with chemotherapy plus high-dose verapamil.
Superiority of ProMACE-CytaBOM over ProMACE-MOPP in the treatment of advanced diffuse aggressive lymphoma: results of a prospective randomized trial [published erratum appears in J Clin Oncol 1991 Apr;9(4):710]
Care of the asthmatic oral and maxillofacial surgery patient.
Tuftsin deficiency in AIDS.
Absence of retroviral sequences in Graves' disease.
Evaluation of enzyme immunoassays for antibody to human T-lymphotropic viruses type I/II.
Improved outcome in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukaemia with reinforced early treatment and rotational combination chemotherapy.
Fulminating multiple sclerosis-like leukoencephalopathy revealing human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Serum and CSF levels of IL-2, sIL-2R, TNF-alpha, and IL-1 beta in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis: expected lack of clinical utility.
Clinical and magnetic resonance imaging in optic neuritis.
The efficacy of azathioprine in relapsing-remitting multiple sclerosis.
Absence of highly homologous sequence to HTLV-I in Japanese multiple sclerosis.
Tropical spastic paraparesis-like illness occurring in a patient dually infected with HIV-1 and HTLV-II.
Primary leptomeningeal lymphoma: report of 9 cases, diagnosis with immunocytochemical analysis, and review of the literature.
Dexamethasone as an adjunct in oropharyngeal obstruction in a patient with leukemia.
Oral melanotic macules in patients infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Beta-2-microglobulin concentrations in pediatric human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Asthma and pregnancy. A challenge for everyone concerned.
Agranulocytosis from antiarrhythmic agents. What to watch for when a medication is first prescribed.
The butterfly rash and the malar flush. What diseases do these signs reflect?
Primary combined immunodeficiency resulting from defective transcription of multiple T-cell lymphokine genes.
Cryoglobulinemia induced by a murine IgG3 rheumatoid factor: skin vasculitis and glomerulonephritis arise from distinct pathogenic mechanisms.
Autoimmune preganglionic sympathectomy induced by acetylcholinesterase antibodies.
Meiotic recombination between yeast artificial chromosomes yields a single clone containing the entire BCL2 protooncogene.
The role of an autoantigen, histidyl-tRNA synthetase, in the induction and maintenance of autoimmunity.
Evolution of sequences encoding the principal neutralization epitope of human immunodeficiency virus 1 is host dependent, rapid, and continuous.
The neurologic workup in patients with cervical spine disorders.
Psychogenic purpura (autoerythrocyte sensitization): an unsolved dilemma.
Aggressive non-Hodgkin's lymphomas in AIDS: the University of Colorado experience.
Thymoma: results of 241 operated cases
Risk stratification of ambulatory patients suspected of Pneumocystis pneumonia.
Effect of race on expression of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome-associated nephropathy.
Lower extremity arterial disease in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Comparison of median and posterior tibial nerve somatosensory evoked potentials in ambulatory patients with definite multiple sclerosis.
In vitro characterization of a biologically active molecular clone of HIV-2NIH-Z containing a nef deletion and expressing a full-length transmembrane protein.
Erythema multiforme major in a 2-month-old child with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection.
Angiotropic B-cell lymphoma (malignant angioendotheliomatosis): failure of systemic chemotherapy.
Donor leukocyte transfusions for treatment of recurrent chronic myelogenous leukemia in marrow transplant patients.
Lack of evidence for infection of or effect on growth of hematopoietic progenitor cells after in vivo or in vitro exposure to human immunodeficiency virus.
Expression of leukocyte alkaline phosphatase gene in normal and leukemic cells: regulation of the transcript by granulocyte colony-stimulating factor.
Monoclonal antibody to the interferon-inducible protein Leu-13 triggers aggregation and inhibits proliferation of leukemic B cells.
t(3;21)(q26;q22): a recurring chromosomal abnormality in therapy-related myelodysplastic syndrome and acute myeloid leukemia.
Reduction of graft failure by a monoclonal antibody (anti-LFA-1 CD11a) after HLA nonidentical bone marrow transplantation in children with immunodeficiencies, osteopetrosis, and Fanconi's anemia: a European Group for Immunodeficiency/European Group for Bone Marrow Transplantation report.
Response rates and survival in primary systemic amyloidosis.
Retinoic acid receptors in myeloid leukemia: characterization of receptors in retinoic acid-resistant K-562 cells.
Remission induction and continuation therapy in children with their first relapse of acute lymphoid leukemia. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
T-cell lymphoma and mature nephroblastoma after synchronous bilateral Wilms' tumor.
In situ hybridization for the detection of Epstein-Barr virus in central nervous system lymphomas.
Long-term survival in Ki-1 lymphoma.
Clinical characteristics of high-grade lymphomas with immune genes in germline configuration.
Pregnancy outcome in hematologic malignancies.
Carbamazepine-induced antinuclear antibodies and systemic lupus erythematosus-like syndrome.
Heterogeneity of autoantibodies against thyroid peroxidase in autoimmune thyroid disease: evidence against antibodies directly inhibiting peroxidase activity as regulatory factors in thyroid hormone metabolism.
Thyroid ultrasonography helps to identify patients with diffuse lymphocytic thyroiditis who are prone to develop hypothyroidism.
Primary lymphoma of the liver: clinical and pathological features of 10 patients.
Bronchopulmonary involvement in ulcerative colitis.
Do nurses or doctors have an increased risk of developing multiple sclerosis?
Multiple sclerosis in Australia and New Zealand: are the determinants genetic or environmental?
Multiple sclerosis among United Kingdom-born children of immigrants from the Indian subcontinent, Africa and the West Indies
Fulminant monophasic multiple sclerosis, Marburg's type.
Management of patients with thyroid carcinoma: application of thallium-201 scintigraphy and magnetic resonance imaging
The use of formal prior directives among patients with HIV-related diseases.
Impairment of specific host defense mechanisms in patients with chronic post-traumatic osteomyelitis.
Anaphylactoid reactions during hemodialysis on AN69 membranes in patients receiving ACE inhibitors.
Cyclosporine for plaque-type psoriasis. Results of a multidose, double-blind trial
Respiratory arrest in near-fatal asthma
Persistent rectal ulcer associated with human papillomavirus type 33 in a patient with AIDS: successful treatment with isotretinoin.
Extrapulmonary pneumocystosis: the first 50 cases.
Native valve endocarditis due to Pseudallescheria boydii in a patient with AIDS: case report and review.
Inpatients with AIDS and AIDS-related complex: economic inpact on hospitals in North Carolina.
Pancreatic carcinoma in an elderly woman with an organic affective disorder and AIDS delusion.
Orbital inflammatory disease associated with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Risk of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) transmission by blood transfusions before the implementation of HIV-1 antibody screening. The Transfusion Safety Study Group.
Hepatobiliary manifestations of the acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Whipple's disease can mimic chronic AIDS enteropathy.
Disseminated Pneumocystis carinii infection with hepatic involvement in a patient with the acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Nodular regenerative hyperplasia: a cause of ascites and hepatomegaly after chemotherapy for leukemia.
Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: a pathologically documented case report.
Association of psychiatric manifestations with antibodies to ribosomal P proteins in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Aggressive primary gastrointestinal lymphomas: review of 91 patients treated with the LNH-84 regimen. A study of the Groupe d'Etude des Lymphomes Agressifs.
Occupational exposure to HIV: frequency and rates of underreporting of percutaneous and mucocutaneous exposures by medical housestaff.
Human immunodeficiency virus-induced immunosuppression: a risk factor for human papillomavirus infection.
Bronchial responsiveness is not increased by bronchoalveolar and bronchial lavage performed after allergen challenge.
The effect of inhaled corticosteroids on the maximal degree of airway narrowing to methacholine in asthmatic subjects.
Thromboxane A2 biosynthesis in acute asthma and after antigen challenge.
Morphometry of the airways during late responses to antigen challenge in the rat.
Quantitative structural analysis of peripheral airways and arteries in sudden fatal asthma.
Methotrexate-induced asthma.
Prevalence of Mycobacterium avium complex in respiratory specimens from AIDS and non-AIDS patients in a San Francisco hospital.
Cutaneous manifestations of multiple myeloma.
Coexistence of spherulocytic disease (myospherulosis) and membranocystic degeneration.
Endoscopic ethmoidectomy and maxillary antrostomy in immunodeficient patients.
Variable prevalence of lymphocytic thyroiditis among diabetes-prone sublines of BB/W or rats.
Delayed-type hypersensitivity initiation by early-acting cells that are antigen mismatched or MHC incompatible with late-acting, delayed-type hypersensitivity effector T cells.
Ultraviolet B radiation converts Langerhans cells from immunogenic to tolerogenic antigen-presenting cells. Induction of specific clonal anergy in CD4+ T helper 1 cells.
Endothelial leukocyte adhesion molecule-1 and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 mediate the adhesion of eosinophils to endothelial cells in vitro and are expressed by endothelium in allergic cutaneous inflammation in vivo
IL-6 production by human T lymphocytes. Expression in HTLV-1-infected but not in normal T cells.
A clonal CD4-positive T-cell line established from the blood of a patient with Sezary syndrome.
T-cell subsets with a naive phenotype are selectively decreased in the peripheral blood of patients with mycosis fungoides.
Limitations in the laboratory diagnosis of vertically acquired HIV infection.
Comparison of HIV detection by virus isolation in lymphocyte cultures and molecular amplification of HIV DNA and RNA by PCR in offspring of seropositive mothers.
Polypharmacy among patients attending an AIDS clinic: utilization of prescribed, unorthodox, and investigational treatments.
Survival differences in patients with AIDS [published erratum appears in J Acquir Immune Defic Syndr 1991;4(7):737]
Plasma adenosine deaminase2: a marker for human immunodeficiency virus infection.
The costs of AIDS in Los Angeles.
Organic dust toxic syndrome: an acute febrile reaction to organic dust exposure distinct from hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Thyroiditis. Acute, subacute, and chronic.
Exposure to an aeroallergen as a possible precipitating factor in respiratory arrest in young patients with asthma
Progression from lymphoid hyperplasia to high-grade malignant lymphoma in mice transgenic for the t(14; 18).
Epidemiology of pediatric HIV infection.
AIDS in the transfusion recipient.
Antiviral therapy for human immunodeficiency virus infection in children.
Psychosocial aspects of AIDS in children and adolescents [published erratum appears in Pediatr Clin North Am 1991 Jun;38(3):viii]
Pediatric HIV disease. The newest chronic illness of childhood.
Laboratory diagnosis of HIV infection.
Host defense abnormalities associated with HIV infection.
Medical care of the HIV-infected child.
Pneumocystis carinii infections in HIV-infected children.
Lymphocytic interstitial pneumonia.
Pathology of childhood AIDS.
Allergenicity of orally administered immunoglobulin preparations in food-allergic children.
Fatal reactions to intravenous nonionic contrast material.
Prediction of severe adverse reactions to ionic and nonionic contrast media in Japan: evaluation of pretesting. A report from the Japanese Committee on the Safety of Contrast Media.
Multiple sclerosis: specificity of MR for diagnosis.
The bone marrow in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-related disease. Morphology and clinical correlation.
HTLV-I associated myelopathy (HAM) after blood transfusion in a patient with CD2+ hairy cell leukemia.
Widespread dissemination of Pneumocystis carinii infection in a patient with acquired immune deficiency syndrome receiving long-term treatment with aerosolized pentamidine.
AIDS-related lymphoma. Histopathology, immunophenotype, and association with Epstein-Barr virus as demonstrated by in situ nucleic acid hybridization.
Urinary excretion of the C5b-9 membrane attack complex of complement is a marker of immune disease activity in autologous immune complex nephritis.
Fibroblast growth factor gene expression in AIDS-Kaposi's sarcoma detected by in situ hybridization.
Olfactory identification deficits in HIV infection.
Immunophenotyping in the management of gastric lymphoma.
Cyclic anaphylaxis associated with menstruation.
Emergency room care of asthmatics: a comparison between Auckland and Toronto.
Second-generation H1-receptor antagonists.
HIV-1 infection in a cohort of haemophilic patients.
Increasing asthma prevalence in a rural New Zealand adolescent population: 1975-89.
Long term outcome of ventilated asthmatics.
Acute myeloid leukemia and background radiation in an expanded case-referent study.
Histopathologic features of high-grade non-Hodgkin's lymphomas in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The French Study Group of Pathology for Human Immunodeficiency Virus-Associated Tumors.
Amebic meningoencephalitis in a patient with AIDS caused by a newly recognized opportunistic pathogen. Leptomyxid ameba.
Interpretive criteria of the Western blot assay for serodiagnosis of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection [published erratum appears in Arch Pathol Lab Med 1991 Aug;115(8):783]
Enhancement of immunoreactivity among lymphoid malignant neoplasms in paraffin-embedded tissues by refixation in zinc sulfate-formalin.
Psychological disturbance in children with haemophilia.
Evaluation of peak flow and symptoms only self management plans for control of asthma in general practice
Progression of HIV infection in misusers of injected drugs who stop injecting or follow a programme of maintenance treatment with methadone.
Salmeterol in nocturnal asthma: a double blind, placebo controlled trial of a long acting inhaled beta 2 agonist
Prominence of slow acetylator phenotype among patients with sulfonamide hypersensitivity reactions.
Plasma histamine, epinephrine, cortisol, and leukocyte beta-adrenergic receptors in nocturnal asthma.
Classifications of acute myeloid leukemia.
The use of cytochemical procedures in the diagnosis and management of acute and chronic myeloid leukemia.
Immunophenotyping of acute myeloid leukemia cells.
Leukemias of indeterminant lineage.
Chromosomal abnormalities in myelodysplastic syndromes and acute myeloid leukemia.
The molecular biology of acute myeloid leukemia. Proto-oncogene expression and function in normal and neoplastic myeloid cells.
The role of ras gene mutations in myeloproliferative disorders.
Granulocytic sarcoma.
Cyclosporine in the treatment of cutaneous T cell lymphoma.
Seborrheic dermatitis and HIV infection. Qualitative analysis of skin surface lipids in men seropositive and seronegative for HIV.
Neutrophilic eccrine hidradenitis in two neutropenic patients.
Growth regulation of a human mature B cell line, B104, by anti-IgM and anti-IgD antibodies.
Hyperphosphorylation of CD20 in hairy cells. Alteration by low molecular weight B cell growth factor and IFN-alpha.
Synergistic action of monoclonal antibodies directed at p55 and p75 chains of the human IL-2-receptor.
Pharmacokinetic disposition of zidovudine during pregnancy.
Cofactors in male-female sexual transmission of human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
The evolution of lymphadenopathy and hypergammaglobulinemia are evidence for early and sustained polyclonal B lymphocyte activation during human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Human T lymphotropic virus type II (HTLV-II) infection in a cohort of New York intravenous drug users: an old infection?
Antibodies to human T lymphotropic virus type I in a population from the Philippines: evidence for cross-reactivity with Plasmodium falciparum.
Recovery of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 from semen: minimal impact of stage of infection and current antiviral chemotherapy.
Ataxia in myxoedema: a neurophysiological reassessment.
HLA and multiple sclerosis in Italy: a review of the literature.
Wernicke's encephalopathy in two patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Prognostic factors in aggressive malignant lymphomas: description and validation of a prognostic index that could identify patients requiring a more intensive therapy. The Groupe d'Etudes des Lymphomes Agressifs
Prognostic variables in patients with diffuse large-cell lymphoma treated with MACOP-B.
Discordant bone marrow involvement in diffuse large-cell lymphoma: a distinct clinical-pathologic entity associated with a continuous risk of relapse.
Pentostatin induces durable remissions in hairy cell leukemia.
The role of dose intensity in determining outcome in intermediate-grade non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
A study of fatigue in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Methotrexate-nonsteroidal antiinflammatory drug interaction in children with arthritis.
Meta-analysis of sulfasalazine in ankylosing spondylitis.
Ankylosing spondylitis with exuberant sclerosis in the sacroiliac joints, symphysis pubis and spine.
Miller Fisher syndrome in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Effects of in vitro electrical stimulation on enhancement and suppression of malignant lymphoma cell proliferation.
Cellular immunity in interstitial cystitis.
Dietary intake in patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), patients with AIDS-related complex, and serologically positive human immunodeficiency virus patients: correlations with nutritional status.
Common variable immunodeficiency: the disorder and treatment.
Children born to women with HIV-1 infection: natural history and risk of transmission. European Collaborative Study.
Immunoglobulins from animal models of motor neuron disease and from human amyotrophic lateral sclerosis patients passively transfer physiological abnormalities to the neuromuscular junction.
Visceral leishmaniasis in HIV infection and AIDS: clinical features and response to therapy.
Broadly neutralizing antibodies elicited by the hypervariable neutralizing determinant of HIV-1 [published erratum appears in Science 1991 Jan 4;251(4989):13]
T cell receptor peptide therapy triggers autoregulation of experimental encephalomyelitis.
When do optic disc edema and peripheral neuropathy constitute poetry? [clinical conference]
Thalidomide: treatment of severe recurrent aphthous stomatitis in patients with AIDS.
Clinical perspective on celiprolol: cardioprotective potential.
Resting energy expenditure is increased in stable, malnourished HIV-infected patients.
A preliminary report on the neuropsychologic sequelae of human immunodeficiency virus.
Clinical aspects of multiple sclerosis in north-east Scotland with particular reference to its course and prognosis.
Serum leukotriene B4 levels in patients with obstructive pulmonary disease.
Utility of bronchoscopic sampling techniques for cryptococcal disease in AIDS.
Atopy and primary lung cancer. Histology and sex distribution.
Spontaneous pneumothorax in AIDS patients with recurrent Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia despite aerosolized pentamidine prophylaxis.
Asthma and chronic obstructive lung disease: a pharmacologic approach.
AIDS in California family medicine. Changing experiences, knowledge, and geographic distribution.
Search for retroviral sequences in peripheral blood mononuclear cells and brain tissue of multiple sclerosis patients.
Motor dysfunction in HIV-infected patients without clinically detectable central-nervous deficit.
Brain-stem auditory evoked potentials in multiple sclerosis: the relation to VEP, SEP and CSF immunoglobulins.
Spontaneous lymphocyte proliferation in HTLV-II infection.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection of human-PBL-SCID mice.
Assessment of risk for HIV-1 infection for missionaries in sub-Saharan Africa.
Wernicke-Korsakoff syndrome complicating T-cell lymphoma: unusual or unrecognized?
Cavitary Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in patients receiving aerosol pentamidine prophylaxis.
Vascularized bone marrow transplantation (VBMT): induction of stable mixed T-cell chimerism and transplantation tolerance in unmodified recipients.
HIV risk behavior reduction following intervention with key opinion leaders of population: an experimental analysis.
Behavioral, health and psychosocial factors and risk for HIV infection among sexually active homosexual men: the Multicenter AIDS Cohort Study.
Sexual risk behaviors, AIDS knowledge, and beliefs about AIDS among runaways.
Security measures for AIDS and HIV.
An evaluation of the use of the Statewide Planning and Research Cooperative System of New York State as a resource planning tool for HIV infection.
Survival trends of people with AIDS in Washington State.
Anaphylactic anaesthetic reactions. The value of paper radioallergosorbent tests for IgE antibodies to muscle relaxants and thiopentone.
Severe anaphylactoid reaction to hydroxyethyl starch.
Heparin-induced thrombocytopenia: a case report.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia and respiratory failure in AIDS. Improved outcomes and increased use of intensive care units.
The normal range of diurnal changes in peak expiratory flow rates. Relationship to symptoms and respiratory disease.
Allergen-induced asthmatic responses. Relationship between increases in airway responsiveness and increases in circulating eosinophils, basophils, and their progenitors.
Asthma in the elderly. A comparison between patients with recently acquired and long-standing disease.
Inhalation of an alkaline aerosol by subjects with mild asthma does not result in bronchoconstriction.
Airways inflammation in nocturnal asthma.
Respiratory membrane permeability and bronchial hyperreactivity in patients with stable asthma. Effects of therapy with inhaled steroids.
Eosinophilic airway inflammation during exacerbation of asthma and its treatment with inhaled corticosteroid.
Hypersensitivity pneumonitis versus invasive pulmonary aspergillosis: two cases with unusual pathologic findings and review of the literature.
Abnormalities in airway smooth muscle in fatal asthma. A comparison between trachea and bronchus.
Lack of evidence for beta-2 receptor selectivity: a study of metaproterenol, fenoterol, isoproterenol, and epinephrine in patients with asthma.
Human immunodeficiency virus-associated eosinophilic folliculitis. A unique dermatosis associated with advanced human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Culture-positive allergic fungal sinusitis.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection of megakaryocytic cells.
IgE-mediated anaphylactic degranulation of isolated human skin mast cells.
Mutations of the ras proto-oncogenes in childhood monosomy 7.
Evidence of a graft-versus-lymphoma effect associated with allogeneic bone marrow transplantation.
Use of the polymerase chain reaction to monitor the effectiveness of ex vivo tumor cell purging.
Clinical assessment of ankylosing spondylitis: a study of observer variation in spinal measurements.
Cytomorphologic, immunocytochemical, and nucleic acid flow cytometric study of 50 lymph nodes by fine-needle aspiration. Comparison with results obtained by subsequent excisional biopsy.
Fine-needle aspiration evaluation of lymphoproliferative lesions in human immunodeficiency virus-positive patients. A multiparameter approach.
Hypersensitivity reactions to epipodophyllotoxins in children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Genotypic analyses of Richter's syndrome.
Fludarabine therapy in hairy cell leukemia.
The Lewis X antigen. A new paraffin section marker for Reed-Sternberg cells.
Lymphomas of the breast. A clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical study of primary and secondary cases.
Clinical significance of hematologic parameters in non-Hodgkin's lymphoma at diagnosis.
Primary central nervous system lymphoma as a secondary malignancy.
Interstitial lung disease.
Autoimmune enteropathy and colitis: is there a generalised autoimmune gut disorder?
Sensitivity to titanium. A cause of implant failure?
Human immunodeficiency virus-infected macrophages produce soluble factors that cause histological and neurochemical alterations in cultured human brains.
Limited B cell repertoire in severe combined immunodeficient mice engrafted with peripheral blood mononuclear cells derived from immunodeficient or normal humans.
Role of mast cells in ion transport abnormalities associated with intestinal anaphylaxis. Correction of the diminished secretory response in genetically mast cell-deficient W/Wv mice by bone marrow transplantation.
No evidence for serological autoimmunity to islet cell heat shock proteins in insulin dependent diabetes.
Effect of a thromboxane A2 receptor antagonist (AA-2414) on bronchial hyperresponsiveness to methacholine in subjects with asthma.
Secretion of granule proteins from eosinophils and neutrophils is increased in asthma.
Food-dependent, exercise-induced anaphylaxis: a study on 11 Japanese cases.
Sensitization to aztreonam and cross-reactivity with other beta-lactam antibiotics in high-risk patients with cystic fibrosis.
An autosomal recessive gene that delays expression of lupus in BXSB mice.
Non-Hodgkins lymphoma of the head and neck: experience in the Grampian area.
Modern haemophilia treatment: medical improvements and quality of life.
Acquired immune dysfunction in cats with experimentally induced feline immunodeficiency virus infection: comparison of short-term and long-term infections.
Marked elevations of serum alkaline phosphatase in patients with AIDS.
Dapsone as a single agent is suboptimal therapy for Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in patients with AIDS: evaluation of lavage and staining techniques in diagnosis.
MRI-guided stereotaxic brain biopsy in neurologically symptomatic AIDS patients.
Zidovudine use in AIDS-free HIV-1-seropositive homosexual men in the Multicenter AIDS Cohort Study (MACS), 1987-1989.
A multicenter proficiency trial of gene amplification (PCR) for the detection of HIV-1.
A cross-sectional study of a program for HIV infection control among public house workers.
Correlation between antibodies to type II collagen and treatment outcome in bilateral progressive sensorineural hearing loss.
Serial CD4 lymphocyte counts and development of AIDS
The Canadian cooperative trial of cyclophosphamide and plasma exchange in progressive multiple sclerosis. The Canadian Cooperative Multiple Sclerosis Study Group
A placebo-controlled trial of maintenance therapy with fluconazole after treatment of cryptococcal meningitis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. California Collaborative Treatment Group.
The role of HTLV in HIV-1 neurologic disease.
Unusual amyloid polyneuropathy with predominant lumbosacral nerve roots and plexus involvement.
Signs of cognitive change in HIV disease: an event-related brain potential study.
Hashimoto's encephalopathy: a steroid-responsive disorder associated with high anti-thyroid antibody titers--report of 5 cases.
A 21-aminosteroid inhibits stimulated monocyte hydrogen peroxide and chemiluminescence measurements from MS patients and controls.
Cerebrospinal fluid eicosanoid levels: endogenous PGD2 and LTC4 synthesis by antigen-presenting cells that migrate to the central nervous system.
Perception of breathlessness during bronchoconstriction induced by antigen, exercise, and histamine challenges.
Analysis of bronchial reactivity in epidemiological studies.
Lung function 8-18 years after intermittent positive pressure ventilation for hyaline membrane disease.
Occupational asthma in a pharmaceutical worker exposed to hydralazine.
Coexistence of testicular carcinoma and hairy cell leukemia.
Surface and cytoplasmic expression of CD45 antigen isoforms in normal and malignant myeloid cell differentiation.
A6--a new 45RO monoclonal antibody for immunostaining of paraffin-embedded tissues.
Use of a probe to repeat sequence of the Y chromosome for detection of host cells in peripheral blood of bone marrow transplant recipients.
Specific controversies concerning the natural history of renal disease in pregnancy.
Maternal and fetal complications in pregnant women with systemic lupus erythematosus.
The increased frequency of cervical dysplasia-neoplasia in women infected with the human immunodeficiency virus is related to the degree of immunosuppression.
Visual recovery in patients with optic neuritis and visual loss to no light perception.
Systemic amyloidosis in transgenic mice carrying the human mutant transthyretin (Met30) gene. Pathologic similarity to human familial amyloidotic polyneuropathy, type I.
Human immunodeficiency virus-infected multinucleated histiocytes in oropharyngeal lymphoid tissues from two asymptomatic patients.
Early cellular events in evolving cutaneous delayed hypersensitivity in humans.
Lack of benefit of methotrexate in severe, steroid-dependent asthma. A double-blind, placebo-controlled study
AIDS enteropathy: occult enteric infections and duodenal mucosal alterations in chronic diarrhea
The acute lupus hemophagocytic syndrome [published erratum appears in Ann Intern Med 1991 Jun 1;114(11):993]
Clinical outcome of seriously ill surgical patients with intra-abdominal infection depends on both physiologic (APACHE II score) and immunologic (DTH score) alterations.
Outcome of pregnancy in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus. A prospective study.
A severe multisystem reaction to sulindac.
Occlusive vasculopathy in systemic lupus erythematosus. Association with anticardiolipin antibody
Ring neutrophils in plasma cell dyscrasia.
Large-cell anaplastic (Ki-1-positive) lymphoma complicated by disseminated intravascular coagulation.
Humoral immunity in surgical patients with and without trauma.
Treatment of multiple sclerosis with hyperbaric oxygen. Results of a national registry.
Alterations in brain phosphate metabolite concentrations in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Detection of herpesvirus DNA in vitreous and aqueous specimens by the polymerase chain reaction.
AIDS incubation in 1891 HIV seroconverters from different exposure groups. International Registry of Seroconverters [published erratum appears in AIDS 1991 Feb;5(2):245]
Sexual behavior before AIDS: the hepatitis B studies of homosexual and bisexual men.
Street-recruited intravenous drug users and sexual risk reduction in New York City.
Prevalence of HIV-1 infection in the Kagera region of Tanzania: a population-based study.
Infection with HIV as a risk factor for adverse obstetrical outcome.
The evolutionary dynamics of HIV-1 quasispecies and the development of immunodeficiency disease.
A cohort study of 89 HIV-1-infected adult patients contaminated by blood products: Bordeaux 1981-1989. Groupe d'Epidemiologie Clinique du SIDA en Aquitaine (GECSA) [published erratum appears in AIDS 1991 Mar;5(3):354]
Trends in survival of Danish AIDS patients from 1981 to 1989.
Surveillance of AIDS in the European Community: recent trends and predictions to 1991.
Detection of HIV-1 in human lung macrophages using the polymerase chain reaction.
Low-dose dapsone prophylaxis of Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in AIDS and AIDS-related complex.
HIV infection is not associated with Reiter's syndrome: data from the Johns Hopkins Multicenter AIDS Cohort Study.
Cyclosporin A in atopic dermatitis: therapeutic response is dissociated from effects on allergic reactions.
Epidermodysplasia verruciformis-associated papillomavirus infection complicating human immunodeficiency virus disease.
Recombinant human granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in combination with standard induction chemotherapy in de novo acute myeloid leukemia.
Expression of the c-fgr and hck protein-tyrosine kinases in acute myeloid leukemic blasts is associated with early commitment and differentiation events in the monocytic and granulocytic lineages.
Macrophage colony-stimulating factor (CSF-1) gene expression in human T-lymphocyte clones.
Loss of interferon antibodies during prolonged continuous interferon-alpha 2a therapy in hairy cell leukemia.
Ki-B5: a monoclonal antibody unrelated to CD45 recognizes normal and neoplastic human B cells in routine paraffin sections.
Effect of tamoxifen on cell lines displaying the multidrug-resistant phenotype.
An epitope on the transferrin receptor preferentially exposed during tumor progression in human lymphoma is close to the ligand binding site.
Inactivation of the retinoblastoma gene in human lymphoid neoplasms.
Circulating erythropoietin levels after bone marrow transplantation: inappropriate response to anemia in allogeneic transplants.
Rapid simultaneous detection of multiple retroviral DNA sequences using the polymerase chain reaction and capillary DNA chromatography.
Detection of early human T-cell lymphotropic virus type I antibody patterns during seroconversion among transfusion recipients.
Impact of HIV on tuberculosis in Zambia: a cross sectional study
Predictive factors for hand eczema.
Anorectal dysfunction in patients with urologic disturbance due to multiple sclerosis.
Colonic histoplasmosis in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. Report of two cases.
High-protein ascites in patients with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Primary biliary cirrhosis: paradigm or paradox for autoimmunity.
Digoxin Immune Fab therapy in the management of digitalis intoxication: safety and efficacy results of an observational surveillance study.
Reduction of budesonide after a year of increased use: a randomized controlled trial to evaluate whether improvements in airway responsiveness and clinical asthma are maintained.
Environmental exposure to cockroach allergens: analysis with monoclonal antibody-based enzyme immunoassays.
Alterations of muscarinic acetylcholine receptors in the nasal mucosa of allergic patients in comparison with nonallergic individuals.
Alterations of adrenoceptors in the nasal mucosa of allergic patients in comparison with nonallergic individuals.
Bronchoalveolar lavage fluid mediator levels 5 minutes after allergen challenge in atopic subjects with asthma: relationship to the development of late asthmatic responses.
Blood eosinophil number and activity in relation to lung function in patients with asthma and with eosinophilia.
Airway effects of inhaled bradykinin, substance P, and neurokinin A in sheep.
Comparison of cockroach allergenic activity in whole body and fecal extracts.
Analyses of microvascular permeability in response to mediators of immediate hypersensitivity.
Administration of IL-7 to mice with cyclophosphamide-induced lymphopenia accelerates lymphocyte repopulation.
Direct identification of the putative surface IgM receptor-associated molecule encoded by murine B cell-specific mb-1 gene.
The prevalence of allergic bronchopulmonary aspergillosis in patients with asthma, determined by serologic and radiologic criteria in patients at risk.
Major histocompatibility gene products and human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Vitamin B12 and folate concentrations in serum and cerebrospinal fluid of neurological patients with special reference to multiple sclerosis and dementia.
Studies with RP 56976 (taxotere): a semisynthetic analogue of taxol.
Pulmonary aspergillosis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome
Application of INSTAT hemostat in the control of gingival hemorrhage in the patient with thrombocytopenia. A case report.
Oral hairy leukoplakia in HIV infection: a diagnostic pitfall.
HIV infection: clinical features and treatment of thirty-three homosexual men with Kaposi's sarcoma.
Treatment of refractory oral candidiasis with fluconazole. A case report.
Major aphthous-like ulcers in patients with AIDS.
HIV infection in healthcare workers. How great is the risk? What can be done before and after exposure?
AIDS and adolescents. How can you help them reduce their risk?
Human immunodeficiency virus transmission by child sexual abuse.
Increased transient tachypnea of the newborn in infants of asthmatic mothers.
Anaphylaxis to annatto dye: a case report.
Relationships between skin prick test, radioallergosorbent test, and chemiluminescent assays in allergic children.
Clustering of fungal allergen-specific IgE antibody responses in allergic subjects.
Substance p-induced cutaneous and bronchial reactions in children with bronchial asthma.
Inhaled bronchodilator's in asthma: low or high dose?
Intestinal permeability in patients with chronic urticaria-angioedema with and without arthralgia.
Pneumothorax in AIDS
Diagnosis of Lyme disease based on dermatologic manifestations.
Therapy of pulmonary nocardiosis in immunocompromised mice.
Recurrent wheezy bronchitis and viral respiratory infections
Down-regulation of adoptive adjuvant-induced arthritis by suppressor factor(s).
Association of the complement allele C4AQ0 with primary Sjogren's syndrome in Japanese patients.
Treatment and career attitudes of prehospital care providers associated with potential exposure to HIV/AIDS.
Choroidal lesions in patients with AIDS.
Seroprevalence of antibodies to HTLV-I in patients with ocular disorders.
Identification of functionally distinct domains of human granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor using monoclonal antibodies.
MYC rearrangement and translocations involving band 8q24 in diffuse large cell lymphomas.
Inhibition of hydroxymethylglutaryl coenzyme A reductase activity induces a paradoxical increase in DNA synthesis in myeloid leukemia cells.
Epstein-Barr virus infection precedes clonal expansion in Burkitt's and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome-associated lymphoma.
Stages I and II diffuse large cell lymphomas: prognostic factors and long-term results with CHOP-bleo and radiotherapy.
Expression of intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (CD54) on hematopoietic progenitors.
Synergistic effects of nerve growth factor and granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor on human basophilic cell differentiation.
Tumor necrosis factor regulates the expression of granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor and interleukin-3 receptors on human acute myeloid leukemia cells.
Magnetic resonance imaging of the head and spine: effective for the clinician or the patient?
Treatment of end-stage chronic obstructive pulmonary disease with double lung transplantation.
Individualized aerobic and high intensity training for asthmatic children in an exercise readaptation program. Is training always helpful for better adaptation to exercise?
Pulmonary tolerance of prophylactic aerosolized pentamidine in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients.
Erythromycin reduces the severity of bronchial hyperresponsiveness in asthma.
Indications for spirometry in outpatients with respiratory disease.
Subcutaneous and mediastinal emphysema associated with hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Potentially fatal asthma and syncope. A new variant of Munchausen's syndrome in sports medicine.
Pericarditis with tamponade due to cytomegalovirus in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Spontaneous regression of cardiomyopathy in a patient with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Pleural Pneumocystis carinii infection.
Esophageal candidiasis in AIDS. Successful therapy with clotrimazole vaginal tablets taken by mouth.
Incidence of hairy cell leukemia, mycosis fungoides, and chronic lymphocytic leukemia in first known HTLV-II-endemic population.
Prolonged CD4+ lymphocytopenia and thrombocytopenia in a chimpanzee persistently infected with human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
Outcome of hepatitis B virus infection in homosexual men and its relation to prior human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Granulocyte colony-stimulating factor enhances the phagocytic and bactericidal activity of normal and defective human neutrophils.
Isolation and characterization of a new human microsporidian, Encephalitozoon hellem (n. sp.), from three AIDS patients with keratoconjunctivitis.
Postexposure prophylaxis with zidovudine suppresses human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection in SCID-hu mice in a time-dependent manner.
Combined zidovudine and interferon-alpha treatment in patients with AIDS-associated Kaposi's sarcoma.
Effects of cigarette smoking on thyroid function and the prevalence of goitre, thyrotoxicosis and autoimmune thyroiditis.
A spreadsheet for AIDS: estimating heterosexual injection drug user population size from AIDS statistics in San Francisco.
Genetic analysis as an aid in diagnosis for patients with midline carcinomas of uncertain histologies
Disseminated human malignant melanoma in congenitally immune-deficient (bg/nu/xid) mice.
Prevalence of antibody to HIV-1 among entrants to US correctional facilities
Urinary tract infection in the impaired host.
Sexual transmission of human T-cell leukemia virus type I associated with the presence of anti-Tax antibody.
scid mutation in mice confers hypersensitivity to ionizing radiation and a deficiency in DNA double-strand break repair.
Very long charge runs in systemic lupus erythematosus-associated autoantigens.
AIDS epidemiology: inconsistencies with human immunodeficiency virus and with infectious disease.
Angiotropic intravascular large-cell lymphoma (malignant angioendotheliomatosis): report of a case and review of the literature.
Gene rearrangements in the diagnosis of lymphoma/leukemia. Guidelines for use based on a multiinstitutional study.
Mycobacteremia in acquired immune deficiency syndrome. Rapid diagnosis based on inclusions in the peripheral blood smear.
Low-protein diet and glomerular size-selective function in membranous glomerulopathy.
Frequency of nonparenteral occupational exposures to blood and body fluids before and after universal precautions training.
Circulating interferon-alpha levels and hypertriglyceridemia in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Intestinal cryptosporidiosis: pathophysiologic alterations and specific cellular and humoral immune responses in rnu/+ and rnu/rnu (athymic) rats.
Elevated alpha-tumor necrosis factor levels in spinal fluid from HIV-1-infected patients with central nervous system involvement.
Major differences in the dynamics of primary and secondary progressive multiple sclerosis.
Correlation of phasic muscle strength and corticomotoneuron conduction time in multiple sclerosis.
Lymphoma, motor neuron diseases, and amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
Allergic histories and reactions of patients treated with digoxin immune Fab (ovine) antibody. The Digibind Study Advisory Panel.
Inflammatory response in retrieved noncemented porous-coated implants.
Bronchial asthma.
Pneumocystis carinii infection of the thyroid in a hypothyroid patient with AIDS: diagnosis by fine needle aspiration biopsy.
Monocytoid B cell lymphoma.
Serum non-organ specific autoantibodies in human immunodeficiency virus 1 infection.
Immunoassay of P2 protein in cerebrospinal fluid in neurological disorders.
Cytogenetic analysis of a granulocytic sarcoma in a patient without systemic leukaemia.
Gastric lymphoma causing granulocytopenia and cold intolerance, with recovery after treatment.
Neuropsychological performance in patients with mild multiple sclerosis.
Systemic lupus erythematosus in Iceland 1975 through 1984. A nationwide epidemiological study in an unselected population.
Juvenile systemic lupus erythematosus among Egyptian children.
Prevalence of antibody to Borrelia burgdorferi in children with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
HIV associated arthropathy: HIV antigen demonstration in the synovial membrane.
Fibromyalgia in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Hypoglycemia due to antiinsulin receptor antibodies in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Lymphoma presenting as a popliteal mass in a patient with rheumatoid arthritis.
Effect of a short course of prednisone in the prevention of early relapse after the emergency room treatment of acute asthma.
Neuropathy caused by spontaneous intraneural hemorrhage: case report.
Grinspan's syndrome: a drug-induced phenomenon?
Pathologic characteristics of human T-cell lymphotropic virus (HTLV)-related extranodal orofacial lymphomas.
Respiratory distress in a child in the office.
Cerebral venous thrombosis: new causes for an old syndrome?
Enhancement of HIV-1 cytocidal effects in CD4+ lymphocytes by the AIDS-associated mycoplasma.
Immunohistochemical characterization of microvascular endothelial cells in primary B cell lymphoma of the gastrointestinal tract.
The role of the physician in the late diagnosis of primary malignant tumors of the small intestine.
Cluster of fulminant hepatitis B in crack users.
Perforation and tumor formation of the intestine in primary amyloidosis.
Cytomegalovirus diaper dermatitis.
Evaluation of treatment protocols on minimal to moderate spasticity in multiple sclerosis.
Changing disease patterns in patients with AIDS in a referral centre in the United Kingdom: the changing face of AIDS
Nosocomial outbreak of cryptosporidiosis in AIDS patients.
Intrathecal immunoglobulin M synthesis in multiple sclerosis. Relationship with clinical and cerebrospinal fluid parameters.
Diagnosis of sulfite and aspirin sensitivity.
Using pulmonary function testing in the diagnosis and treatment of asthma.
Prognostic significance of Doppler measures of diastolic function in cardiac amyloidosis. A Doppler echocardiography study.
Human growth hormone-variant is a biologically active somatogen and lactogen.
Islet cell antibodies in patients with autoimmune thyroid disease.
The sensitized liver represents a rich source of endogenous leukotrienes.
Leukocyte counts and activation in spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats
Transforming growth factor-beta and suppression of humoral immune responses in HIV infection.
Vaccination with Legionella pneumophila membranes induces cell-mediated and protective immunity in a guinea pig model of Legionnaires' disease. Protective immunity independent of the major secretory protein of Legionella pneumophila.
An autocrine role for urokinase in phorbol ester-mediated differentiation of myeloid cell lines.
Tumor necrosis factor downregulates granulocyte-colony-stimulating factor receptor expression on human acute myeloid leukemia cells and granulocytes.
Identification of lymphotoxin and tumor necrosis factor in multiple sclerosis lesions.
Infantile acute hemorrhagic edema of the skin: study of ten cases.
Allergy and toxicodermia from shiitake mushrooms.
A syndrome characterized by nodular eosinophilic infiltration of the skin and immunoglobulin isotype imbalance.
Group A streptococcal cellulitis-adenitis in a patient with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Symptomatic polyneuropathy in human immunodeficiency virus antibody seropositive men with and without immune deficiency: a comparative electrophysiological study.
Cauda equina syndrome associated with multiple lumbar arachnoid cysts in ankylosing spondylitis: improvement following surgical therapy.
Binary methods for continuous outcomes: a parametric alternative.
The history of nitrite in human nutrition: a contribution from German cookery books.
Human growth hormone and insulin-like growth factor-1 enhance the proliferation of human leukemic blasts.
A phase I clinical trial of 2-chlorodeoxyadenosine in pediatric patients with acute leukemia.
A phase I trial of monoclonal antibody M195 in acute myelogenous leukemia: specific bone marrow targeting and internalization of radionuclide.
Program directors' attitudes towards residents' care of patients who have AIDS.
Differences in access to zidovudine (AZT) among symptomatic HIV-infected persons.
Pathogenesis and recent therapeutic approaches to graft-versus-host disease.
A hospital-based prospective study of perinatal infection with human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
Gastrointestinal dysfunction and disaccharide intolerance in children infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Effect of therapeutic plasma concentrations of theophylline on behavior, cognitive processing, and affect in children with asthma [published erratum appears in J Pediatr 1991 Jul;119(1 Pt 1):164]
Blood contacts during surgical procedures
Ditiocarb sodium (diethyldithiocarbamate) therapy in patients with symptomatic HIV infection and AIDS. A randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled, multicenter study.
Cutaneous vasoconstrictor response to glucocorticoids in asthma.
Meniere's disease: an immune complex-mediated illness?
The effect of indoor air pollutants on otitis media and asthma in children.
Travel in eastern Europe. Guidelines for patients.
Screening for sexually transmitted diseases by primary care physicians.
Profound papilledema due to cryptococcal meningitis in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: successful treatment with fluconazole.
Focal hepatic tuberculosis in a patient with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Lymphoma of the gastric stump: report of a case.
Histologic abnormalities of large and small coronary arteries, neural structures, and the conduction system of the heart found in postmortem studies of individuals dying from the toxic oil syndrome.
Hypercalcemia with excess serum 1,25 dihydroxyvitamin D in lymphomatoid granulomatosis/angiocentric lymphoma.
Marked plasmacytosis and immunoglobulin abnormalities following infusion of streptokinase.
Susceptibility to Coxsackievirus B3-induced chronic myocarditis maps near the murine Tcr alpha and Myhc alpha loci on chromosome 14.
A retrospective cohort study of the risk of tuberculosis among women of childbearing age with HIV infection in Zaire.
Adverse health effects among adults exposed to home dampness and molds.
Is the clinical history a satisfactory means of diagnosing occupational asthma?
Dynamic T-cell changes in peripheral blood and bronchoalveolar lavage after antigen bronchoprovocation in asthmatics.
Effects of zymosan-activated human granulocytes on isolated human airways.
Inhaled furosemide prevents both the bronchoconstriction and the increase in neutrophil chemotactic activity induced by ultrasonic "fog" of distilled water in asthmatics.
Infections in HIV-infected travelers: risks and prevention.
Ciprofloxacin-resistant methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus in an acute-care hospital.
Comparison of oral fluconazole and clotrimazole troches as treatment for oral candidiasis in patients infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Holidays and atopic eczema.
Hydration in severe acute asthma.
Bad news: delivery, dialogue, and dilemmas.
The association of allergen skin test reactivity and respiratory disease among whites in the US population. Data from the Second National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, 1976 to 1980.
Characteristics of patients with syphilis attending Baltimore STD clinics. Multiple high-risk subgroups and interactions with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection and indeterminate western blot patterns. Prospective studies in a low prevalence population.
Physicians' effectiveness in assessing risk for human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Successful treatment of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome-related Mycobacterium avium complex disease with a multiple drug regimen including amikacin.
Papillary endothelial hyperplasia in the thyroid following fine-needle aspiration.
The role of the immunogenetics laboratory in marrow transplantation.
Quantitative neurologic and neurobehavioral testing of persons infected with human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
An assessment of disability rating scales used in multiple sclerosis.
Lymphomatous polyneuropathy. Biopsy of clinically involved nerve and successful treatment.
1,25-Dihydroxyvitamin D3 receptor RNA: expression in hematopoietic cells.
Cytogenetic studies in untreated Hodgkin's disease.
In vivo administration of granulocyte colony-stimulating factor (G-CSF), granulocyte-macrophage CSF, interleukin-1 (IL-1), and IL-4, alone and in combination, after allogeneic murine hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.
13-cis-retinoic acid in the treatment of elderly patients with acute myeloid leukemia. A phase II pilot study of the Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group.
A brief-duration combination chemotherapy for elderly patients with poor-prognosis non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Human immunodeficiency virus-associated Hodgkin's disease. Clinicopathologic studies of 24 cases and preponderance of mixed cellularity type characterized by the occurrence of fibrohistiocytoid stromal cells.
The effectiveness of double-gloving in otolaryngology.
Lymphocytotoxins in sera from highly sensitized multiparous dialysis patients: antibody class, relationship with the HLA and with paternal antigens.
Inhibition of anaphylaxis-evoked intestinal fluid secretion by the dual application of an H1 antagonist and cyclooxygenase inhibitor.
Adenovirus colitis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Photoinactivation of T-cell function with psoralen and UVA radiation suppresses the induction of experimental murine graft-versus-host disease across major histocompatibility barriers.
Hematologic aspects of mastocytosis: II: management of hematologic disorders in association with systemic mast cell disease.
Senile cardiac amyloidosis associated with homozygosity for a transthyretin variant (ILE-122).
Mononuclear phagocyte system dysfunction in murine SLE: abnormal clearance kinetics precede clinical disease.
Inhibition of platelet GPIIb/IIIa binding to fibrinogen by serum factors: studies of circulating immune complexes and platelet antibodies in patients with hemophilia, immune thrombocytopenic purpura, human immunodeficiency virus-related immune thrombocytopenic purpura, and systemic lupus erythematosus.
Immunological differentiation between neuroborreliosis and multiple sclerosis.
Warning: fatal reaction to the use of fibrin glue in deep hepatic wounds. Case reports.
Clinical and laboratory correlates of Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in children infected with HIV.
CD4 T-lymphocyte counts and Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in pediatric HIV infection.
Prevalence of HIV infection in childbearing women in the United States. Surveillance using newborn blood samples.
Platelet activating factor receptor blockade ameliorates murine systemic lupus erythematosus.
Mesangial cell accessory functions: mediation by intercellular adhesion molecule-1.
Imaging of dialysis-related amyloid (AB-amyloid) deposits with 131I-beta 2-microglobulin.
Treatment of hepatitis B virus-associated membranous nephropathy with adenine arabinoside and thymic extract.
Stiff-man syndrome.
Endothelin immunoreactivity of airway epithelium in asthmatic patients.
Oral manifestations of HIV infection and their management. I. More common lesions.
Oral manifestations of HIV infection and their management. II. Less common lesions.
Complications of central venous catheters in pediatric patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Reliability and validity of the work assessment scale for persons with multiple sclerosis.
The sensation of pulmonary dyspnea in school-age children.
An in vivo model of somatic cell gene therapy for human severe combined immunodeficiency.
No evidence of frequent human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection in seronegative at-risk individuals.
The critical role of blood from HLA-homozygous donors in fatal transfusion-associated graft-versus-host disease in immunocompetent patients.
Amyloidosis of the small intestine: findings on double-contrast radiographs.
The risks of death and of severe nonfatal reactions with high- vs low-osmolality contrast media: a meta-analysis.
Anergy in pediatric head trauma patients.
Endocrine function in children with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Small non-cleaved-cell lymphoma (undifferentiated lymphoma, Burkitt's type) in American adults: results with treatment designed for acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Capacity of US labs to provide TLI in support of early HIV-1 intervention.
Response of hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, and home health agencies in Oregon to AIDS: reports of nursing executives.
Neural control of airway vasculature and edema.
Neuropeptides and asthma.
Modulation of neurogenic inflammation by neutral endopeptidase.
Airway inflammation during late asthmatic reactions induced by toluene diisocyanate.
PAF antagonism as an approach to the treatment of airway hyperreactivity.
The changing prognosis of classic hemophilia (factor VIII "deficiency").
NIH conference. Immunopathogenic mechanisms in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection.
Lattice corneal dystrophy type IIIA. Clinical and histopathologic correlations.
Association of HLA antigens with Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada syndrome in a Han Chinese population.
Rheumatic symptoms and human immunodeficiency virus infection. The influence of clinical and laboratory variables in a longitudinal cohort study.
In vitro regulation of B cell differentiation by interleukin-6 and soluble CD23 in systemic lupus erythematosus B cell subpopulations and antigen-induced normal B cells.
Identification of the target antigen in chronic bullous disease of childhood and linear IgA disease of adults.
A case of classical mycosis fungoides associated with human T-cell lymphotropic virus type I.
The chest radiograph appearances seen following high dose chemotherapy and autologous bone marrow transplantation for resistant malignant lymphoma.
Should urologists wear spectacles for transurethral resection of the prostate?
Urological manifestations of HIV-related disease. A case of AIDS-associated testicular seminoma, Kaposi's sarcoma and possible intracranial lymphoma.
Chronic relapsing experimental allergic neuritis induced by repeated transfer of P2-protein reactive T cell lines.
Blood-brain barrier damage in acute multiple sclerosis plaques. An immunocytological study.
Cells secreting anti-MAG antibody occur in cerebrospinal fluid and bone marrow in patients with polyneuropathy associated with M component.
Responses of single spinal motoneurons to magnetic brain stimulation in healthy subjects and patients with multiple sclerosis.
Correlation of SEP abnormalities with brain and cervical cord MRI in multiple sclerosis.
Hodgkin's disease in association with human immunodeficiency virus infection. Pathologic and immunologic features.
The relapse of hairy cell leukemia after a 32-year remission.
Acute tumor lysis syndrome after intrathecal methotrexate administration.
Tumor lysis syndrome in a patient with metastatic Merkel cell carcinoma.
Negligent hiring and retention: some evidence of hospital vulnerability.
Allergen-induced increase in airway responsiveness and inflammation in mild asthma.
Musculoskeletal manifestations of amyloidosis. A review of 83 patients on haemodialysis for at least 10 years.
Disposable attachments in cryosurgery: a useful adjunct in the treatment of HIV-associated neoplasms.
Rehabilitation of a patient with asthma in the outpatient setting.
Allergenic structures in cockroach hypersensitivity.
Clinical and immunologic evaluations of reactive dye-exposed workers.
Occupational allergy to pancreatic powder: characterization of IgE-binding antigens in pancreatic extract by immunoblotting.
Intraoperative anaphylaxis: an association with latex sensitivity.
The release of platelet-activating factor into plasma during allergen-induced bronchoconstriction.
A comparison of cutaneous testing and ELISA testing for assessing reactivity to ethylene oxide-human serum albumin in hemodialysis patients with anaphylactic reactions.
Eosinophil cationic protein stimulates and major basic protein inhibits airway mucus secretion.
The effect of dapsone in steroid-dependent asthma.
Local immunotherapy with Dermatophagoides extract in asthma.
Increase of ovalbumin (OVA)-specific B cells in the peripheral blood of egg-allergic patients.
Clinical and immunologic reactivity of patients allergic to grass pollens and to multiple pollen species. I. Clinical and immunologic characteristics.
Anti-La antibody production by MRL-1pr/1pr mice. Analysis of fine specificity.
The naive repertoire of human T helper cells specific for gp120, the envelope glycoprotein of HIV.
Autoantibodies to nucleolin in systemic lupus erythematosus and other diseases.
Autoantibodies to the centrosome (centriole) react with determinants present in the glycolytic enzyme enolase.
Class II-restricted T cell responses in Theiler's murine encephalomyelitis virus-induced demyelinating disease. IV. Identification of an immunodominant T cell determinant on the N-terminal end of the VP2 capsid protein in susceptible SJL/J mice.
Enhanced modulation of antibodies coating guinea pig leukemic cells in vitro and in vivo. The role of Fc gamma R expressing cells.
The incidence of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) in fetal cord samples utilized as serum supplements for in vitro fertilization.
Clinical management of the complications of HIV infection.
Mycobacterial disease associated with HIV infection.
Assessing HIV infection in primary care practice.
Neurologic and psychiatric manifestations of HIV disease.
HIV disease in the intravenous drug user: role of the primary care physician.
Caring for women at risk of HIV infection.
Controversies in the management of HIV-related illnesses.
Primary care and HIV disease.
Recent advances in the medical management of early HIV disease.
Approaches to the treatment of cytomegalovirus retinitis: ganciclovir and foscarnet.
Concomitant ganciclovir and zidovudine treatment for cytomegalovirus retinitis in patients with HIV infection: an approach to treatment.
Combined ganciclovir and recombinant human granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in the treatment of cytomegalovirus retinitis in AIDS patients.
Cytomegalovirus colitis in AIDS: presentation in 44 patients and a review of the literature.
Cytomegalovirus colitis and wasting.
Clinical use of ganciclovir for cytomegalovirus infection and the development of drug resistance.
Cytomegalovirus as a possible cofactor in HIV disease progression.
Future directions in the management of cytomegalovirus infections.
Diagnosis and treatment of cytomegalovirus retinitis.
Decreasing the risk of human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B virus infection during endoscopic surgery.
Possible health care professional-to-patient HIV transmission. Dentists' reactions to a Centers for Disease Control report.
Adult Still's disease: manifestations, disease course, and outcome in 62 patients.
Epstein-Barr virus lymphoproliferative disease associated with acquired immunodeficiency.
Multiple sclerosis, retroviruses, and PCR. The HTLV-MS Working Group.
Plasma exchange in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis: a long-term study.
Multiple sclerosis and narcolepsy: possible similar genetic susceptibility.
Normal and leukemic hematopoietic cells manifest differential sensitivity to inhibitory effects of c-myb antisense oligodeoxynucleotides: an in vitro study relevant to bone marrow purging.
P-31 spectroscopy study of response of superficial human tumors to therapy.
Miscellaneous adverse effects of low-versus high-osmolality contrast media: a study revised
Potential HIV exposure in psychiatrically hospitalized adolescent girls.
Methacholine challenges in the management of young children.
Emergency management of childhood bronchial asthma: a multicenter survey.
Theophylline inhibits early and late asthmatic reactions induced by allergens in asthmatic subjects.
Transmission of gram-negative bacilli to asthmatic children via home nebulizers.
Human immunodeficiency virus vpr gene encodes a virion-associated protein.
Enhancement of soluble CD4-mediated HIV neutralization and gp 120 binding by CD4 autoantibodies and monoclonal antibodies.
Expression of HTLV-I envelope protein fused to hydrophobic amino-terminal peptide of baculovirus polyhedrin in insect cells and its application for serological assays.
Feline immunodeficiency virus (FIV) infection in the cat as a model for HIV infection in man: FIV-induced impairment of immune function.
Expression of HIV-1 integrase in E. coli: immunological analysis of the recombinant protein.
Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) circulating immune complexes in infected children.
Platelet antibodies in serum of patients with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection.
Exposure factors for HIV-1 infection among heterosexual drug abusers in New Jersey treatment programs [published erratum appears in AIDS Res Hum Retroviruses 1991 Mar;7(3):360]
Anorectal surgery in the HIV+ patient: update.
Squamous cell carcinoma of the anus and HIV infection.
Pilot study of sandostatin (octreotide) therapy of refractory HIV-associated diarrhea.
Intestinal pseudoobstruction secondary to amyloidosis responsive to cisapride.
Mycosis fungoides-like lesions associated with phenytoin and carbamazepine therapy.
Pruritic papular eruption of the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: a clinicopathologic study.
The new cutaneous mucinoses: a review with an up-to-date classification of cutaneous mucinoses.
Endoscopy in the diagnosis of gastrointestinal Mycobacterium avium-intracellulare infection.
Pancreatic involvement in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Cryptosporidium infection in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: not always a poor prognosis.
Safety of casein hydrolysate formula in children with cow milk allergy.
Milk protein enteropathy after acute infectious gastroenteritis: experimental and clinical observations.
A rapid method for quantitating the frequency of peripheral blood cells containing HIV-1 DNA.
Characterization of long-term survivors of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The Long-term Survivor Collaborative Study Group.
National AIDS incidence trends and the extent of zidovudine therapy in selected demographic and transmission groups.
Blind serosurvey of HIV antibodies in newborns in 92 Italian hospitals: a method for monitoring the infection rate in women at time of delivery.
AIDS-associated polyclonal lymphoma: identification of a new HIV-associated disease process.
High incidence of hepatitis B infection and evolution of chronic hepatitis B infection in patients with advanced HIV infection.
HIV-2 and HIV-1 AIDS cases in Senegal: clinical patterns and immunological perturbations.
Human immunodeficiency virus type-1 infection of homosexual men is accompanied by a decrease in circulating B cells.
Cerebrospinal fluid anti-cardiolipin antibodies in patients with HIV-1 infection.
Primary lymphoma of bone: a clinicopathologic study of 25 cases reported over 10 years.
Primary renal lymphoma.
A controlled study of inhaled pentamidine for primary prevention of Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
Potential of community-wide chemotherapy or immunotherapy to control the spread of HIV-1.
Rhegmatogenous retinal detachments in patients with AIDS and necrotizing retinal infections.
Anterior granulomatous uveitis in patients with multiple sclerosis.
Climatic droplet keratopathy with corneal amyloidosis.
Drug fever. Remember to consider it in diagnosis.
A case of Rhodococcus equi brain abscess.
In vitro evaluation of bleomycin-induced cell lethality from plastic and glass containers.
Foscarnet sodium.
Corticosteroids for acute, severe asthma.
Cumulative AIDS incidence and altered mortality from mycobacterial disease: New Jersey.
Factors determining pulmonary deposition of aerosolized pentamidine in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Lung function and bronchial reactivity in asthmatics during exposure to volatile organic compounds.
Effect of atopy on the natural history of symptoms, peak expiratory flow, and bronchial responsiveness in 7- and 8-year-old children with cough and wheeze. A 12-month longitudinal study.
The safety aspects of fiberoptic bronchoscopy, bronchoalveolar lavage, and endobronchial biopsy in asthma.
A bradykinin antagonist modifies allergen-induced mediator release and late bronchial responses in sheep.
Disability in persons hospitalized with AIDS.
Two types of abnormal somatosensory evoked potentials in chronic cerebellar ataxias.
Increased risk of leukemia relapse with high-dose cyclosporine A after allogeneic marrow transplantation for acute leukemia.
High-dose cytarabine and daunorubicin induction and postremission chemotherapy for the treatment of acute myelogenous leukemia in adults.
Mutation of the p53 gene in human acute myelogenous leukemia.
Epstein-Barr virus in benign lymph node biopsies from individuals infected with the human immunodeficiency virus is associated with concurrent or subsequent development of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Alloimmune neonatal neutropenia due to an antibody to the neutrophil Fc-gamma receptor III with maternal deficiency of CD16 antigen.
Intrapleural tetracycline for spontaneous pneumothorax in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Comparison of peak expiratory flow rate and FEV1 in assessing bronchomotor tone after challenges with occupational sensitizers.
Effects of PAF antagonist, BN52021, on the PAF-, methacholine-, and allergen-induced bronchoconstriction in asthmatic children.
Theophylline in asthma and COPD: changing perspectives and controversies.
Susceptibility to autoimmune chronic active hepatitis: human leukocyte antigens DR4 and A1-B8-DR3 are independent risk factors.
Persistent airway hyperresponsiveness after neonatal viral bronchiolitis in rats.
Gelsolin-related amyloidosis. Identification of the amyloid protein in Finnish hereditary amyloidosis as a fragment of variant gelsolin.
Restricted heterogeneity of T lymphocytes in combined immunodeficiency with hypereosinophilia (Omenn's syndrome).
Human eosinophil major basic protein induces airway constriction and airway hyperresponsiveness in primates.
Comparison of saliva and blood for human immunodeficiency virus prevalence testing.
Prevalence of resistance in patients receiving ganciclovir for serious cytomegalovirus infection.
Safety and pharmacokinetics of 566C80, a hydroxynaphthoquinone with anti-Pneumocystis carinii activity: a phase I study in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected men.
Detection and quantification of human immunodeficiency virus RNA in patient serum by use of the polymerase chain reaction.
Hepatic involvement in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection: discrepancies between AIDS patients and those with earlier stages of infection.
Intermittent, alternating, and concurrent regimens of zidovudine and 2'-3' dideoxycytidine in the LP-BM5 murine induced immunodeficiency model.
Pneumococcal soft-tissue infections: possible association with connective tissue diseases [published erratum appears in J Infect Dis 1991 Jul;164(1):232]
AIDS in primary care: a report from the Ambulatory Sentinel Practice Network.
Patient attitudes and knowledge about HIV infection and AIDS.
The prevalence of multiple sclerosis in the Southampton and South West Hampshire Health Authority.
Evidence of serum-protein leakage across the blood-brain barrier in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Neuro-ophthalmic manifestations of human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Optic neuritis.
The influence of a family history of asthma and parental smoking on airway responsiveness in early infancy [published erratum appears in N Engl J Med 1991 Sep 5;325(10):747]
A placebo-controlled, double-blind, randomized, two-center, pilot trial of Cop 1 in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis.
The sensitivity of transcranial cortical magnetic stimulation in detecting pyramidal tract lesions in clinically definite multiple sclerosis.
Public knowledge about AIDS: a survey of dental school patients. Part I.
Public knowledge about AIDS: a survey of dental school patients. Part II.
Clinical-physiologic correlations in acute asthma of childhood.
Retroviral sequences related to human T-lymphotropic virus type II in patients with chronic fatigue immune dysfunction syndrome.
Parasitic diseases. Diseases associated with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Oncolytic effects of fatty acids in mice and rats.
Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and adolescents. Knowledge, attitudes, and behaviors of runaway and homeless youths.
Aerosol pentamidine prophylaxis following Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in AIDS patients: results of a blinded dose-comparison study using an ultrasonic nebulizer
Systemic treatment of AIDS-related Kaposi's sarcoma: results of a randomized trial.
Aggressive Kaposi's sarcoma and campylobacter bacteremia in a female with transfusion associated AIDS.
The systemic distribution of Epstein-Barr virus genomes in fatal post-transplantation lymphoproliferative disorders. An in situ hybridization study.
Human T-lymphotropic virus type I infection in the Solomon Islands.
In-vitro assessment of a hypersensitivity syndrome associated with sorbinil.
Sustained remission of membranous glomerulonephritis after cyclophosphamide and prednisone.
Cytomegalovirus neuropathy in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: a clinical and pathological study.
The predictive value of intrathecal immunoglobulin synthesis and magnetic resonance imaging in acute isolated syndromes for subsequent development of multiple sclerosis.
Human microglial cells: characterization in cerebral tissue and in primary culture, and study of their susceptibility to HIV-1 infection.
Quinolinic acid in cerebrospinal fluid and serum in HIV-1 infection: relationship to clinical and neurological status.
Cerebrospinal fluid dynamics in the tardive cauda equina syndrome of ankylosing spondylitis.
Zidovudine (AZT) for treatment of patients infected with human immunodeficiency virus type 1. An evaluation of effectiveness in clinical practice.
Internal capsule plaque and tonic spasms in multiple sclerosis.
Fulminant pseudomonal keratitis and scleritis in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients.
Elimination of soluble 123I-labeled aggregates of IgG in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus. Effect of serum IgG and numbers of erythrocyte complement receptor type 1.
Association of immunoglobulin Km and Gm allotypes with specific antinuclear antibodies and disease susceptibility among connective tissue disease patients.
A potential role for microbial superantigens in the pathogenesis of systemic autoimmune disease.
Restriction fragment length polymorphism of the tumor necrosis factor region in patients with ankylosing spondylitis.
Bilateral homonymous visual field defects as initial manifestation of multiple sclerosis.
Risk of tuberculosis in patients with HIV-I and HIV-II infections in Abidjan, Ivory Coast.
Is risk of Kaposi's sarcoma in AIDS patients in Britain increased if sexual partners came from United States or Africa? [published erratum appears in BMJ 1991 Mar 30;302(6779):752]
Defects of the retinal pigment epithelium in scleroderma.
Is diet important in rheumatoid arthritis?
Autoimmune disease and HTLV-1 infection.
Combined computed tomography and dacryocystography for complex lacrimal problems.
Monocytoid B-cell lymphoma arising in extranodal organs.
Primary cutaneous B-cell lymphoma: a unique type of low-grade lymphoma. Clinicopathologic and immunologic study of 83 cases.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia associated with profound lymphopenia and abnormal T-lymphocyte subset ratios during treatment for early-stage breast carcinoma.
Malnutrition and carbohydrate malabsorption in children with vertically transmitted human immunodeficiency virus 1 infection.
Autoimmune chronic active hepatitis in a family.
Outpatient AIDS care squeezed by high costs, low payments.
Immunohistological characterisation of amyloid deposits in renal biopsy specimens.
DNA flow cytometry of follicular non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Histometric studies on cellular infiltrates of tuberculin tests in patients with sarcoidosis.
Immunocytological diagnosis of primary cerebral non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Recovery of CD3+ and CD5- lymphocyte subpopulation after autologous bone marrow transplantation and chemotherapy.
Effect of salbutamol on gastroesophageal reflux in healthy volunteers and patients with asthma.
Source of the aeroallergen of soybean dust: a low molecular mass glycopeptide from the soybean tela.
Cellular and biochemical characteristics of bronchoalveolar lavage fluid in symptomatic nonallergic asthma.
A combined single-blind, double-blind, placebo-controlled study to determine the reproducibility of hypersensitivity reactions to aspartame.
Differences in mediator release between allergic rhinitis and asthma.
The prevention of immediate generalized reactions to radiocontrast media in high-risk patients.
Pseudolymphoma of the parapharyngeal space.
The use of FDG-PET in the detection and management of malignant lymphoma: correlation of uptake with prognosis.
C-reactive protein levels during disease exacerbations and infections in systemic lupus erythematosus: a prospective longitudinal study.
Is there sexual inequality in ankylosing spondylitis? A study of 498 women and 1202 men.
Declines in the range of motion and malalignment in hands of patients with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis studied over 6 years.
Arthritis impact measurement scales: reliability of a French version and validity in adult Still's disease.
Normal pressure hydrocephalus in a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Disseminated zygomycosis associated with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Acute central nervous system complications after pulse steroid therapy in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Vertebral body collapse due to primary amyloidosis.
Coexistence of ochronosis and ankylosing spondylitis.
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in patients with advanced HIV infection treated with zidovudine.
Follicular mucinosis: histopathologic review of 33 cases.
AIDS-associated non-Hodgkin lymphoma.
Clinical significance of small-intestinal microsporidiosis in HIV-1-infected individuals
Induction of anti-phospholipid syndrome in naive mice with mouse lupus monoclonal and human polyclonal anti-cardiolipin antibodies.
Vaccination against autoimmune mouse diabetes with a T-cell epitope of the human 65-kDa heat shock protein.
Transplantation of wheat germ agglutinin-positive hematopoietic cells to prevent or induce systemic autoimmune disease.
Oligopyrimidine tract at the 5' end of mammalian ribosomal protein mRNAs is required for their translational control.
Observations after human immunodeficiency virus immunization and challenge of human immunodeficiency virus seropositive and seronegative chimpanzees.
The scimitar syndrome.
Human immunodeficiency virus associated with thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura: successful treatment with zidovudine.
Repeated intestinal ulcerations in a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus and high serum antiphospholipid antibody levels.
Prescribed fenoterol and death from asthma in New Zealand, 1981-7: a further case-control study.
Effect of terbutaline on bronchoconstriction induced by nebulised pentamidine.
Role of urologist in diagnosis of multiple sclerosis.
Pneumocystis carinii infection presenting as necrotizing thyroiditis and hypothyroidism.
Dysmegakaryopoiesis resembling acute megakaryoblastic leukemia in treated acute myeloid leukemia.
Kaposi's sarcoma in the bone marrow of a patient with AIDS.
Granulocytic sarcoma (chloroma). Presentation of an unusual case.
Cuba's response to the HIV epidemic.
Effects of an intervention program on AIDS-related drug and needle behavior among intravenous drug users.
Adult survivors of childhood sexual abuse and subsequent risk of HIV infection.
Evaluating needle exchange: do distributed needles come back?
HIV-1 prevalence in selected Tijuana sub-populations.
HIV infection in an Ethiopian prison.
Comparison of AIDS knowledge, attitudes, and behaviors among incarcerated adolescents and a public school sample in San Francisco.
New York State HIV seroprevalence project: goals, windows, and policy consideration.
Projection of AIDS incidence in women in New York State.
HIV infection among women entering the New York State correctional system.
HIV seroprevalence in a facility for runaway and homeless adolescents.
The AIDS epidemic in New York State.
HIV seroprevalence surveys: impetus for preventive activities.
Compliance in clinical trials of two nonbronchodilator, antiasthma medications.
Occupational asthma and rhinoconjunctivitis from inhalation of crystalline bovine serum albumin powder.
Asthmatic patients with panic disorders: report of three cases with management and outcome.
Bambuterol: a new long acting bronchodilating prodrug.
House dust mites in the West Indies.
Improved stability in oral delivery of albuterol provides less variability in bronchodilation in adults with asthma.
The allergic patient who is noncompliant and abusive: dealing with the adverse experience.
Prognostic value of serum beta-2 microglobulin in low-grade lymphoma.
Mycobacterium kansasii: a cause of treatable pulmonary disease associated with advanced human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection.
Fetal human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection of different organs in the second trimester.
Results of a randomized trial comparing idarubicin and cytosine arabinoside with daunorubicin and cytosine arabinoside in adult patients with newly diagnosed acute myelogenous leukemia.
Increased circulating colony-stimulating factor-1 in patients with preleukemia, leukemia, and lymphoid malignancies.
Two-step differentiation of AML-193 leukemic line: terminal maturation is induced by positive interaction of retinoic acid with granulocyte colony-stimulating factor (CSF) and vitamin D3 with monocyte CSF.
A retrospective analysis of therapy for acute graft-versus-host disease: secondary treatment.
Autologous bone marrow transplantation in acute myelogenous leukemia: in vitro treatment with myeloid-specific monoclonal antibodies and drugs in combination.
In vivo measurements of the fraction of dose of bleomycin labeled with cobalt 57 delivered to human tumors.
A clinicopathologic study of node-based, low-grade, peripheral T-cell lymphoma. Angioimmunoblastic lymphoma, T-zone lymphoma, and lymphoepithelioid lymphoma.
Primary anterior mediastinal B-cell lymphoma. A clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical study of 16 cases.
Disseminated leiomyosarcoma in a child with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Cytokine biology. Implications for transfusion medicine.
Reversibility of cardiac abnormalities in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected individuals: a serial echocardiographic study.
Kinetics of T cell activation in acute and chronic forms of murine graft-versus-host disease.
Studies on the induction of anterior chamber-associated immune deviation (ACAID). 1. Evidence that an antigen-specific, ACAID-inducing, cell-associated signal exists in the peripheral blood.
Murine IgE and IgG responses to melittin and its analogs.
Epitopes of the p70 and p80 (Ku) lupus autoantigens.
Culture and properties of cells derived from Kaposi sarcoma.
Determinant selection in murine experimental autoimmune myasthenia gravis. Effect of the bm12 mutation on T cell recognition of acetylcholine receptor epitopes.
Experimental autoimmune encephalomyelitis is exacerbated by IL-1 alpha and suppressed by soluble IL-1 receptor.
Association of murine lupus and thymic full-length endogenous retroviral expression maps to a bone marrow stem cell.
IL-4 is required for the IgE and IgG1 increase and IgG1 autoantibody formation in mice treated with mercuric chloride.
Studies on the induction of anterior chamber-associated immune deviation (ACAID). II. Eye-derived cells participate in generating blood-borne signals that induce ACAID.
Precursors of both conventional and Ly-1 B cells can escape feedback inhibition of Ig gene rearrangement.
Low-dose ACOP-B and VABE: weekly chemotherapy for elderly patients with advanced-stage diffuse large-cell lymphoma.
Multivariate analysis of prognostic factors in stage IV follicular low-grade lymphoma: a risk model.
Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor mitigates the neutropenia of combined interferon alfa and zidovudine treatment of acquired immune deficiency syndrome-associated Kaposi's sarcoma.
HTLV-I/II seroprevalence and HIV/HTLV coinfection among U.S. intravenous drug users.
Seroprevalence of retroviral infection in women with different fertility statuses in Gabon, western equatorial Africa.
Hospital use by HIV patients in Italy: a retrospective longitudinal study. National Study Group on HIV-Related Hospital Use.
Postexposure chemoprophylaxis: approval criteria for clinical trials.
The spectrum of Mycobacterium kansasii disease associated with HIV-1 infected patients.
Relation between HIV-1 syncytium inhibition antibodies and clinical outcome in children.
Listeriosis in patients infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Rhodococcus equi infection in patients with and without human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Manifestations of pulmonary cryptococcosis in patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Rhodococcus equi infection in the patient with AIDS: literature review and report of an unusual case.
Engraftment and development of human T and B cells in mice after bone marrow transplantation.
Anaphylaxis associated with latex allergy during barium enema examinations.
CT of AIDS-related lymphoma.
Molecular analyses of an acidic transthyretin Asn 90 variant.
Atopic disease and immunoglobulin E in twins reared apart and together.
Proline at position 36: a new transthyretin mutation associated with familial amyloidotic polyneuropathy.
Antiretroviral therapy and immunomodulators in patients with AIDS.
Antiretroviral therapy in combination with interferon for AIDS-related Kaposi's sarcoma.
Relative resistance of primary HIV-1 isolates to neutralization by soluble CD4.
Risk factors for needle sharing among methadone-treated patients.
Implications of self-reported cognitive and motor dysfunction in HIV-positive patients.
The role of platelet-activating factor in asthma.
The role of leukotriene antagonists and inhibitors in the treatment of airway disease.
The potential roles of leukotrienes in bronchial asthma.
Fungal sinusitis in immunocompromised children with neoplasms.
Effects of pentamidine alone and in combination with ketoconazole or itraconazole on the growth of Candida albicans.
In vitro susceptibility of Mycobacterium avium complex to the new fluoroquinolone sparfloxacin (CI-978; AT-4140) and comparison with ciprofloxacin.
Wilderness emergency medical services: the experiences at Sequoia and Kings Canyon National Parks.
Report of a WHO informal consultation on preclinical and clinical aspects of the use of immunomodulators in HIV infection. Geneva, 3-5 April 1989. World Health Organization Global Programme on AIDS.
The safety and pharmacokinetics of GLQ223 in subjects with AIDS and AIDS-related complex: a phase I study
Diminution of inducible lymphokine-activated killer cell activity in individuals with AIDS-related disorders.
Trends and risk factors for HIV-1 seropositivity among outpatient children, Kinshasa, Zaire.
AIDS and HIV infection in Uganda--are more women infected than men?
The Edinburgh cohort of HIV-positive drug users: auditory event-related potentials show progressive slowing in patients with Centers for Disease Control stage IV disease.
Establishment of a phylogenetic survey system for AIDS-related lentiviruses and demonstration of a new HIV-2 subgroup.
Seroprevalence and clinical manifestations of HIV-1 infection in Kananga, Zaire.
Salmonella meningitis and infection with HIV.
Sequential autonomic function tests in HIV infection.
Monoclonal antibody YB5.B8 identifies the human c-kit protein product.
Intensive sequential chemotherapy with mitoxantrone and continuous infusion etoposide and cytarabine for previously treated acute myelogenous leukemia.
Possible mechanism of selective killing of myeloid leukemic blast cells by lymphokine-activated killer cells.
Establishment of a human acute myeloid leukemia cell line (Kasumi-1) with 8;21 chromosome translocation.
Studies of allogeneic bone marrow and spleen cell transplantation in a murine model using ultraviolet-B light.
Nebulized atropine sulfate in the treatment of acute asthma.
Epidemiology of extrapulmonary tuberculosis. A comparative analysis with pre-AIDS era.
Delivered dose and regional distribution of aerosolized pentamidine using different delivery systems.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection of enterocytes and mononuclear cells in human jejunal mucosa.
Hepatobiliary cryptosporidiosis and cytomegalovirus infection mimicking metastatic cancer to the liver.
Comparing dentists' attitudes and knowledge concerning AIDS: differences and similarities by locale.
The influence of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection on the development of the hepatitis B virus carrier state.
Long-term human immunodeficiency virus infection in asymptomatic homosexual and bisexual men with normal CD4+ lymphocyte counts: immunologic and virologic characteristics.
Mortality rates from multiple sclerosis: geographical and temporal variations revisited.
SPECT, MRI and cognitive functions in multiple sclerosis.
Physiological analysis of simple rapid movements in patients with cerebellar deficits.
Neuropsychological deficit in haemophiliacs with human immunodeficiency virus.
Orthotopic liver transplantation, Epstein-Barr virus, cyclosporine, and lymphoproliferative disease: a growing concern.
Helper T-cell responses in children infected with human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
Diagnosis and treatment of cranial neuralgias.
Concomitant medical disease and headache.
Lung function improvement in asthma with a cysteinyl-leukotriene receptor antagonist
Mortality among workers exposed to ethylene oxide.
Zidovudine and the natural history of the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Studies on corticosteroid therapy in Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada disease.
Pediatric acquired immunodeficiency syndrome hospitalizations in New Jersey.
Risk factors associated with chronic fatigue syndrome in a cluster of pediatric cases.
Mycosis fungoides: cutaneous T-cell lymphoma [published erratum appears in Am Fam Physician 1991 Jun;43(6):1954]
Cryptococcal pleural effusion preceding cryptococcal meningitis in AIDS.
Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome with disseminated toxoplasmosis presenting as an acute pulmonary and gastrointestinal illness.
In vitro antimicrobial susceptibility testing for the newly identified AIDS-associated Mycoplasma. Mycoplasma fermentans (incognitus strain).
Small intestinal lesion resembling graft-vs-host disease. A case report in immunodeficiency and review of the literature.
Glutethimide treatment of disabling action tremor in patients with multiple sclerosis and traumatic brain injury.
High-dose intramuscular triamcinolone in severe, chronic, life-threatening asthma [published erratum appears in N Engl J Med 1991 May 9;324(19):1380]
Hemifacial spasm. Occurrence in multiple sclerosis.
Anaphylactic reaction because of intrauterine 32% dextran-70 instillation.
Separation of late bronchial responses from airway hyperresponsiveness in allergic sheep.
Recombinant human thyrotropin (TSH) receptor in a radioreceptor assay for the measurement of TSH receptor autoantibodies.
Autosomal dominant inheritance of autoantibodies to thyroid peroxidase and thyroglobulin--studies in families not selected for autoimmune thyroid disease.
Generation and analysis of clonal IgM- and IgG-producing human B cell lines expressing an anti-DNA-associated idiotype.
Expression of mRNA for interleukin-5 in mucosal bronchial biopsies from asthma.
Rheumatoid factors isolated from patients with autoimmune disorders are derived from germline genes distinct from those encoding the Wa, Po, and Bla cross-reactive idiotypes.
Apoptosis as a mechanism of cell death in cultured T lymphoblasts acutely infected with HIV-1.
Association of circulating receptor Fc gamma RIII-positive monocytes in AIDS patients with elevated levels of transforming growth factor-beta.
Regulation of tumor necrosis factor gene expression by ionizing radiation in human myeloid leukemia cells and peripheral blood monocytes.
Expression of endothelial-leukocyte adhesion molecule-1 in elicited late phase allergic reactions.
Oral Kaposi's sarcoma in a woman as a first indication of HIV infection.
The expression of endothelial leukocyte adhesion molecule-1 (ELAM-1), intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1), and vascular cell adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1) in experimental cutaneous inflammation: a comparison of ultraviolet B erythema and delayed hypersensitivity.
Childhood sexual abuse in patients with paradoxical vocal cord dysfunction.
Care for caregivers: a support group for staff caring for AIDS patients in a hospital-based primary care practice
Disease progression and viral genome variants in experimental feline leukemia virus-induced immunodeficiency syndrome [published erratum appears in J Acquir Immune Defic Syndr 1991;4(9):925]
Ranitidine improves certain cellular immune responses in asymptomatic HIV-infected individuals.
Brain growth and cognitive improvement in children with human immunodeficiency virus-induced encephalopathy after 6 months of continuous infusion zidovudine therapy.
Serum erythropoietin titers in patients with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection and anemia.
Incidence of campylobacteriosis among patients with AIDS in Los Angeles County.
Invasive aspergillosis in patients with HIV infection: report of two patients and a review of the literature.
Drug use and HIV-1 infection: report from the Second Italian Multicenter Study.
Lack of evidence for HIV-2 infection among at-risk individuals in Brazil.
Lymphocyte immunophenotypes among anti-HTLV-I/II-positive blood donors and recipients. The Transfusion Safety Study Group.
Amyloidosis in a case of ankylosing spondylitis with a review of the literature.
Candida albicans septic arthritis and osteomyelitis of the sternoclavicular joint in a patient with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Importance of the immune response to the Ro/La particle in the development of congenital heart block and neonatal lupus erythematosus.
The L1 protein as a new indicator of inflammatory activity in patients with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
Restriction fragment length polymorphism analysis of HLA-DR, DQ, DP and C4 alleles in Caucasians with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Multicentric osteolysis: an infrequently recognized renal-rheumatologic syndrome.
New light on uveitis in ankylosing spondylitis.
Overwhelming fatal infection in a young woman after intravenous cyclophosphamide therapy for lupus nephritis.
Abnormally high level of C4b binding protein and deficiency of free fraction of protein S in a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus and recurrent thromboses.
Superior vena cava occlusion in a patient with antiphospholipid antibody syndrome.
Arthritis and nephritis in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
IgG autoantibodies against C1q are correlated with nephritis, hypocomplementemia, and dsDNA antibodies in systemic lupus erythematosus.
The relationship between soluble interleukin 2 receptor levels and antidouble stranded DNA antibody levels in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Immunologic effects of plasmapheresis synchronized with pulse cyclophosphamide in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Systemic lupus erythematosus and lymphoma: association with antiphospholipid syndrome.
Danazol therapy in autoimmune hemolytic anemia associated with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Multiple site avascular necrosis in HIV infected patients.
Projections of the incidence of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma related to acquired immunodeficiency syndrome
MDR1 gene expression and treatment outcome in acute myeloid leukemia
Reversal of nonresponders and postexposure prophylaxis by intradermal hepatitis B vaccination in Japanese medical personnel.
Bone mineral density in premenopausal women receiving long-term physiological doses of levothyroxine.
Primary soft tissue tumours of the pelvis causing referred pain in the leg.
Squamous cell carcinoma of the umbilicus associated with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Identification of hepatitis A virus as a trigger for autoimmune chronic hepatitis type 1 in susceptible individuals.
Anti-B-cell monoclonal antibodies in the treatment of severe B-cell lymphoproliferative syndrome following bone marrow and organ transplantation.
Membranous nephropathy related to hepatitis B virus in adults.
Primary ocular malignant lymphoma associated with the acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Surgical risk of hemorrhage in cerebral amyloid angiopathy.
Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and human immunodeficiency virus infection in Nevada.
Carcinomas with metaplasia and sarcomas of the breast.
t(11;14) (q13;q32) in B-cell lymphomas (intermediately differentiated lymphocytic and follicular). A report of four cases.
Immunoglobulin expression in B-cell lymphoma. Immunohistochemical study of 345 cases.
Leu-22 (L60). A more sensitive marker than UCHL1 for peripheral T-cell lymphomas, particularly large-cell types.
Recurrent and de novo renal disease after kidney transplantation with or without cyclosporine A.
Lewy bodies are immunoreactive with antibodies raised to gelsolin related amyloid-Finnish type.
Syphilis superinfection activates expression of human immunodeficiency virus I in latently infected rabbits.
Loss of antigens associated with the apical endocytotic pathway in proximal tubules from rats with heymann nephritis.
Bronchial challenge with adenosine causes the release of serum neutrophil chemotactic factor in asthma.
Attenuation of inhaled allergen-induced airway microvascular leakage and airflow obstruction in guinea pigs by a 5-lipoxygenase inhibitor (A-63162).
Glucocorticoid receptor characteristics in monocytes of patients with corticosteroid-resistant bronchial asthma.
Urinary leukotriene E4 concentrations increase after aspirin challenge in aspirin-sensitive asthmatic subjects.
Pulmonary mechanics in lymphangioleiomyomatosis.
Follow-up bronchoalveolar lavage in AIDS patients with Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia. Pneumocystis carinii burden predicts early relapse.
Increased recovery of surfactant protein A in AIDS-related pneumonia.
Morphology of the airway wall in asthma and in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
The roles of inflammatory cells in the pathogenesis of asthma and of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
Pharmacology of airway smooth muscle in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease and in asthma [published erratum appears in Am Rev Respir Dis 1991 Sep;144(3 Pt 1):733]
The increased responsiveness to inhaled methacholine in asthma: combination of causative factors.
Relationship of airway hyperresponsiveness to respiratory symptoms and diurnal peak flow variation in patients with obstructive lung disease. The Dutch CNSLD Study Group.
Total respiratory resistance and reactance in patients with asthma, chronic bronchitis, and emphysema.
Sniff esophageal and nasopharyngeal pressures and maximal relaxation rates in patients with respiratory dysfunction.
Altitude and allergy to house-dust mites. A paradigm of the influence of environmental exposure on allergic sensitization.
Blood eosinophilia and FEV1. Cross-sectional and longitudinal analyses.
Changes in mucociliary clearance during acute exacerbations of asthma.
Prolonged protection against methacholine-induced bronchoconstriction by the inhaled beta 2-agonist formoterol.
Plasmapheresis does not increase the risk for infection in immunosuppressed patients with severe lupus nephritis. The Lupus Nephritis Collaborative Study Group.
An experimental human model of metal fume fever.
Acetaminophen does not impair clearance of zidovudine.
Acute reversible hypoxemia in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Aerosol pentamidine for secondary prophylaxis of AIDS-related Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia. A randomized, placebo-controlled study.
Remarkable in vitro and in vivo activities of the hydroxynaphthoquinone 566C80 against tachyzoites and tissue cysts of Toxoplasma gondii.
Fluconazole in the treatment of candidiasis in immunocompromised children.
Macromolecular absorption and cows' milk allergy.
Leukaemia mortality among relatives of cystic fibrosis patients.
Autoimmune Addison's disease and thyrotoxic thyroiditis presenting as encephalopathy in twins.
Anonymous human immunodeficiency virus surveillance and clinically directed testing in a Newark, NJ, hospital.
Long-term safety and efficacy of zidovudine in patients with advanced human immunodeficiency virus disease. Zidovudine Epidemiology Study Group.
Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada syndrome. Clinical course, therapy, and long-term visual outcome.
Mycosis fungoides metastatic to the orbit.
Defective CD2 pathway T cell activation in systemic lupus erythematosus [published erratum appears in Arthritis Rheum 1991 Jul;34(7):926]
Detection and quantification of human anti-Sm antibodies using synthetic peptide and recombinant SmB antigens.
Substance P antagonist inhibits immediate and delayed type cutaneous hypersensitivity reactions.
Acral pseudolymphomatous angiokeratoma of children (APACHE): a case report and immunohistological study.
Etretinate and AIDS-related Reiter's disease.
Periodontitis as an early presentation of HIV infection.
Primary central nervous system lymphoma in acquired immune deficiency syndrome. A clinical and pathologic study with results of treatment with radiation.
Basal fuel homoeostasis in symptomatic human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Acute colorectal ischaemia after anaphylactoid shock.
Cloning and sequencing of a novel 64-kDa autoantigen recognized by patients with autoimmune thyroid disease.
Effect of cetirizine on histamine- and leukotriene D4-induced bronchoconstriction in patients with atopic asthma.
Regulation of human basophil activation. I. Dissociation of cationic dye binding from histamine release in activated human basophils.
The IgE and IgG subclass antibody response to foods in babies during the first year of life and their relationship to feeding regimen and the development of food allergy.
Immunotherapy with cat- and dog-dander extracts. V. Effects of 3 years of treatment.
Soluble Fc epsilon R II levels in normal children and patients with immunodeficiency diseases.
An open-label study of high-dose intravenous immunoglobulin in severe childhood asthma.
Release of eosinophil granule proteins during IgE-mediated allergic skin reactions.
The effect of nedocromil sodium on the early and late reaction and allergen-induced bronchial hyperresponsiveness.
Anti-P autoantibody production requires P1/P2 as immunogens but is not driven by exogenous self-antigen in MRL mice.
Epidermal Langerhans cells are not principal reservoirs of virus in HIV disease.
In vitro infection with HIV enables human CD4+ T cell clones to induce noncognate contact-dependent polyclonal B cell activation.
Tumor antigen presentation by murine epidermal cells.
Adrenocortical insufficiency: a rare presentation of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Neuronal loss in the frontal cortex in HIV infection
Hyaline globules reacting positively with zidovudine antibody in brain and spinal cord of AIDS patients.
Midbrain vs. pontine medial longitudinal fasciculus lesions: the utilization of masseter and blink reflexes.
Magnetic resonance imaging of the head in the diagnosis of multiple sclerosis: a prospective 2-year follow-up with comparison of clinical evaluation, evoked potentials, oligoclonal banding, and CT.
Cognitive dysfunction in multiple sclerosis. I. Frequency, patterns, and prediction.
Cognitive dysfunction in multiple sclerosis. II. Impact on employment and social functioning.
Relapsing transverse myelitis.
Public health nurses and AIDS.
AIDS-related risk factors, medical diagnosis, do-not-resuscitate orders and aggressiveness of nursing care.
Quality of life as a function of HIV classification.
Effect of injected long-acting epinephrine in addition to aerosolized albuterol in the treatment of acute asthma in children.
Differential diagnosis of bacterial myositis in AIDS: evaluation with MR imaging.
Primary central nervous system lymphoma versus toxoplasmosis in AIDS.
The many faces of multivisceral transplantation.
Effect of a 5-lipoxygenase inhibitor on leukotriene generation and airway responses after allergen challenge in asthmatic patients.
Relation between nocturnal symptoms and changes in lung function on lying down in asthmatic children.
Platelet activation in nocturnal asthma.
Haemopericardium and cardiac tamponade complicating pulmonary lymphangioleiomyomatosis.
Cholestasis in patients with the acquired immune deficiency syndrome: comparison between ultrasonographic and cholangiographic findings.
Resolution of Cryptosporidium infection in an AIDS patient after improvement of nutritional and immune status with octreotide.
Staphylococcal pyomyositis in patients infected by the human immunodeficiency virus.
Psychotropic drug prescribing for hospitalized patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Prevalence and incidence of human immunodeficiency virus among patients undergoing long-term hemodialysis. The Cooperative Dialysis Study Group.
POEMS syndrome with idiopathic flushing mimicking carcinoid syndrome.
Lymphocytic interstitial pneumonitis in autoimmune thyroid disease.
Asthmatic responses to airborne acid aerosols.
Isolated anterior uveitis in a child with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Improvement of auditory brainstem responses after treatment with zidovudine in a child with AIDS.
Platelet aggregating activity in serum from patients with HLA-B27 associated rheumatic and cardiac disorders: a possible link to the proliferative vascular changes.
Mycobacterium avium-intracellulare induces interleukin-6 from human monocytes and large granular lymphocytes.
Human herpesvirus-6 in human lymphomas: identification of specific sequences in Hodgkin's lymphomas by polymerase chain reaction.
Antilymphocytic antibodies and marrow transplantation. XIV. Antibody-induced suppression of graft-versus-host disease in C3-decomplemented mice differentiates two T-cell-depletion pathways.
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma presenting as a primary tumor of the liver: presentation, diagnosis and outcome in eight patients.
Influenza A and the virus associated haemophagocytic syndrome: cluster of three cases in children with acute leukaemia.
Use of electron microscopy in examination of faeces and rectal and jejunal biopsy specimens.
Listeria meningitis and pate.
Magnetic resonance imaging of cutaneous neoplasms: clinicopathologic correlation.
Ischaemic myelopathy secondary to disseminated intravascular coagulation in AIDS.
Allergic reactions to long-term benzathine penicillin prophylaxis for rheumatic fever. International Rheumatic Fever Study Group.
Immunomodulation of experimental allergic encephalomyelitis by antibodies to the antigen-Ia complex.
Serum levels of CA 125 are elevated in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus.
Role of surgery in multimodality therapy for gastrointestinal lymphoma.
Zidovudine resistance predicted by direct detection of mutations in DNA from HIV-infected lymphocytes.
Applications of a computer simulation model of the natural history of CD4 T-cell number in HIV-infected individuals.
Antibody-dependent cellular cytotoxicity against HIV-1 in sera of immunized chimpanzees.
The reliability and validity of a scale to measure HIV risk-taking behaviour among intravenous drug users.
Needle-use practices among intravenous drug users in an area where needle purchase is legal.
Visceral leishmaniasis: another HIV-associated opportunistic infection? Report of eight cases and review of the literature.
Negative correlation between blood cell counts and serum neopterin concentration in patients with HIV-1 infection.
No effect of zidovudine on hepatitis B virus replication in homosexual men with symptomatic HIV-1 infection.
Assessment of HIV status using the polymerase chain reaction in antibody-positive patients and high-risk antibody-negative haemophiliacs.
Long-term follow-up of children with testicular tumours: surgical issues.
Acute and chronic renal disease in hospitalized AIDS patients.
Intravenous immunoglobulin therapy of membranous nephropathy: efficacy and safety.
Refractoriness for ultrasonically nebulized distilled water and histamine after histamine challenge.
Oral melanoma and other pigmented lesions of the oral cavity.
Eosinophil cationic protein in sera of patients with atopic dermatitis.
Borrelia burgdorferi-associated cutaneous B cell lymphoma: clinical and immunohistologic characterization of four cases.
Detection of anti-basement membrane zone antibodies in bullous systemic lupus erythematosus.
Human T cells in the SCID-hu mouse are phenotypically normal and functionally competent.
Recognition of peptides that are immunopathogenic but cryptic. Mechanisms that allow lymphocytes sensitized against cryptic peptides to initiate pathogenic autoimmune processes.
Release of the cytokines colony-stimulating factor-1, granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor, and IL-6 by cloned murine vascular smooth muscle cells.
Defective neutrophil function in the autoimmune mouse strain MRL/lpr. Potential role of transforming growth factor-beta.
Initiation of delayed-type hypersensitivity by low doses of monoclonal IgE antibody. Mediation by serotonin and inhibition by histamine.
Clinical and virologic effects of recombinant human granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in patients receiving chemotherapy for human immunodeficiency virus-associated non-Hodgkin's lymphoma: results of a randomized trial.
Evidence for early lower urinary tract dysfunction in clinically silent multiple sclerosis.
Prostatic abscess due to histoplasma capsulatum in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
HIV infection among members of the US Army Reserve Components with medical and health occupations.
The spectrum of IgE-mediated responses to latex.
Epidemiology of women with AIDS in the United States, 1981 through 1990. A comparison with heterosexual men with AIDS.
Treatment choice for infants in the neonatal intensive care unit at risk for AIDS.
Isoniazid as preventive therapy in HIV-infected intravenous drug abusers. A decision analysis.
The HIV/AIDS epidemic: the first 10 years.
Update: acquired immunodeficiency syndrome--United States, 1981-1990 [published erratum appears in MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 1991 Jun 14;40(23):395]
Purified protein derivative (PPD)-tuberculin anergy and HIV infection: guidelines for anergy testing and management of anergic persons at risk of tuberculosis.
A phase I evaluation of the safety and immunogenicity of vaccination with recombinant gp160 in patients with early human immunodeficiency virus infection. Military Medical Consortium for Applied Retroviral Research
Lymphoproliferative lesion of the hypoglossal nerve: case report.
Impact of the human immunodeficiency virus epidemic on mortality in children, United States.
Knowledge and attitudes of day care center parents and care providers regarding children infected with human immunodeficiency virus.
Role of flexible bronchoscopy and bronchoalveolar lavage in the diagnosis of pediatric acquired immunodeficiency syndrome-related pulmonary disease.
Virus burden in human immunodeficiency virus type 1-infected children: relationship to disease status and effect of antiviral therapy.
A link between double-strand break-related repair and V(D)J recombination: the scid mutation.
Low temperature and peptides favor the formation of class I heterodimers on RMA-S cells at the cell surface.
Human dermal mast cells contain and release tumor necrosis factor alpha, which induces endothelial leukocyte adhesion molecule 1.
Characterization of genetic variation and 3'-azido-3'-deoxythymidine- resistance mutations of human immunodeficiency virus by the RNase A mismatch cleavage method.
Murine adenovirus infection of SCID mice induces hepatic lesions that resemble human Reye syndrome.
Human antibody response following multiple injections of bovine collagen.
LAV revisited: origins of the early HIV-1 isolates from Institut Pasteur.
The reappearance of abdominal tuberculosis.
Blood contact and exposure in the operating room.
Escherichia coli bacteremia in children. A review of 91 cases in 10 years.
Stressful life events and symptom onset in HIV infection.
Leishmanin skin test standardization and evaluation of safety, dose, storage, longevity of reaction and sensitization.
Current status of mold immunotherapy.
Evaluation of severe reactions to sweat bee stings.
Measurement of leukotriene C4 and D4 in arterial blood of asthmatic patients during remission.
Pharmacist advice to asthmatics regarding antihistamine use.
Association between corticosteroids and psychologic change in hospitalized asthmatic children.
Atopic dermatitis provoked by AL721 in a patient with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Antiinflammatory-antioxidant treatment with a methane sulfonanilide in allergen-induced asthma.
Lymphography--current role in oncology.
Medical and surgical treatment of nonallergic asthma associated with gastroesophageal reflux
The effect of maximal doses of formoterol and salbutamol from a metered dose inhaler on pulse rates, ECG, and serum potassium concentrations.
The arrhythmogenicity of theophylline. A multivariate analysis of clinical determinants.
Asthma deaths.
Syphilis, neurosyphilis, penicillin, and AIDS.
Chronic Cryptosporidium parvum infections in congenitally immunodeficient SCID and nude mice.
Mycobacterium avium infection and AIDS: a therapeutic dilemma in rapid evolution.
Foscarnet therapy for ganciclovir-resistant cytomegalovirus retinitis in patients with AIDS.
Influence of human immunodeficiency virus infection on cell-mediated immunity in chronic D hepatitis.
Two cases of blastomycosis from a common source: use of DNA restriction analysis to identify strains.
Men, women and primary lung cancer--a Saskatchewan personal interview study.
Recognition of human 60 kD heat shock protein by mononuclear cells from patients with juvenile chronic arthritis.
DNA amplification on induced sputum samples for diagnosis of Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
Diseases that mimic multiple sclerosis.
Immunosuppressive drugs in immune and inflammatory ocular disease [published erratum appears in Surv Ophthalmol 1991 May-Jun;35(6):475]
Gastrointestinal malignancy in patients with AIDS.
Staging and follow-up of primary gastric lymphoma by endoscopic ultrasonography.
Acute pancreatitis and systemic lupus erythematosus: necropsy of a case and review of the pancreatic vascular lesions.
Case report: serendipitous Gaucher's disease presenting as elevated erythrocyte sedimentation rate due to monoclonal gammopathy.
Failure of electric shock treatment for rattlesnake envenomation.

